2155 | confident (adjective): sure of yourself and not afraid | loc: упевнений | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: That confident smile works.
  ua TS: Ця впевнена усмішка працює.
  EN FS: That nervous smile works.
  ua FS: Ця нервова усмішка працює.
  EN TP: a confident half-smile
  ua TP: впевнена напівусмішка
  EN FP: a confident loud laugh
  ua FP: впевнений гучний сміх
2156 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: горизонт
  EN TS: The sun sits on the horizon.
  ua TS: Сонце лежить на горизонті.
  EN FS: The moon sits on the horizon.
  ua FS: Місяць лежить на горизонті.
  EN TP: the sun on the horizon
  ua TP: сонце на горизонті
  EN FP: a ship on the horizon
  ua FP: корабель на горизонті
2157 | india (noun): a large country in South Asia | loc: Індія
  EN TS: A baby from India wears gold.
  ua TS: Малюк з Індії вбраний у золото.
  EN FS: A baby from India wears red.
  ua FS: Малюк з Індії вбраний у червоне.
  EN TP: a painting from India
  ua TP: картина з Індії
  EN FP: a carpet from India
  ua FP: килим з Індії
2158 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: хустка
  EN TS: Love the orange headscarf!
  ua TS: Обожнюю цю помаранчеву хустку!
  EN FS: Love the blue headscarf!
  ua FS: Обожнюю цю синю хустку!
  EN TP: an orange headscarf
  ua TP: помаранчева хустка
  EN FP: taking off a headscarf
  ua FP: знімає хустку
2159 | majestic (adjective): grand and impressive, like a king | loc: величний
  EN TS: The cat feels very majestic.
  ua TS: Кіт почувається дуже величним.
  EN FS: The dog feels very majestic.
  ua FS: Пес почувається дуже величним.
  EN TP: a majestic cat
  ua TP: величний кіт
  EN FP: a majestic lion
  ua FP: величний лев
2161 | genius (noun): an exceptionally intelligent person | loc: геній
  EN TS: The genius has a new idea.
  ua TS: У генія нова ідея.
  EN FS: The genius has a new cat.
  ua FS: У генія новий кіт.
  EN TP: a genius gazing at stars
  ua TP: геній дивиться на зорі
  EN FP: a genius writing formulas
  ua FP: геній пише формули
2162 | ginger (adjective): having orange-red hair | loc: рудий
  EN TS: Her ginger hair looks perfect.
  ua TS: Її руде волосся просто ідеальне.
  EN FS: Her black hair looks perfect.
  ua FS: Її чорне волосся просто ідеальне.
  EN TP: long ginger hair in waves
  ua TP: довге руде хвилясте волосся
  EN FP: ginger hair in a bun
  ua FP: руде волосся в пучку
2164 | woods (noun): an area of land covered with trees | loc: ліс
  EN TS: A path goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  ua TS: Стежка веде в ліс. Хто йде перший?
  EN FS: A river goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  ua FS: Річка веде в ліс. Хто йде перший?
  EN TP: a path through the woods
  ua TP: стежка крізь ліс
  EN FP: a cabin in the woods
  ua FP: хатинка в лісі
2172 | sports car (noun): a fast low car built for speed and fun | loc: спортивне авто
  EN TS: A sports car in a paint storm.
  ua TS: Спортивне авто в буревії фарб.
  EN FS: A sports car in a snow storm.
  ua FS: Спортивне авто в сніговій бурі.
  EN TP: a dark-blue sports car
  ua TP: темно-синє спортивне авто
  EN FP: a dark-blue family car
  ua FP: темно-синє сімейне авто
2174 | bloom (verb): to open flowers; to be full of flowers | loc: квітнути
  EN TS: A tree is blooming in snow!
  ua TS: Дерево квітне в снігу!
  EN FS: A tree is burning in snow!
  ua FS: Дерево горить у снігу!
  EN TP: a tree blooming at night
  ua TP: дерево квітне вночі
  EN FP: flowers blooming in spring
  ua FP: квіти цвітуть навесні
2175 | midnight (noun): twelve o'clock at night | loc: північ
  EN TS: Midnight in the pine forest.
  ua TS: Північ у сосновому лісі.
  EN FS: Midnight in the desert.
  ua FS: Північ у пустелі.
  EN TP: midnight under the stars
  ua TP: північ під зорями
  EN FP: a party at midnight
  ua FP: вечірка опівночі
2176 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: прохід
  EN TS: It is raining in the aisle!
  ua TS: У проході йде дощ!
  EN FS: It is snowing in the aisle!
  ua FS: У проході йде сніг!
  EN TP: a rainy library aisle
  ua TP: дощовий прохід у бібліотеці
  EN FP: a busy supermarket aisle
  ua FP: людний прохід у супермаркеті
2177 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: діджей
  EN TS: Even the moon came for the DJ!
  ua TS: Навіть місяць прийшов на діджея!
  EN FS: Even the sun came for the DJ!
  ua FS: Навіть сонце прийшло на діджея!
  EN TP: a DJ on the street
  ua TP: діджей на вулиці
  EN FP: a DJ in a club
  ua FP: діджей у клубі
2178 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: зазирнути
  EN TS: Psst, two cats are peeking.
  ua TS: Псс, двоє котів зазирають.
  EN FS: Psst, two dogs are peeking.
  ua FS: Псс, двоє псів зазирають.
  EN TP: peeking behind leaves
  ua TP: зазирає з-за листя
  EN FP: peeking through a window
  ua FP: зазирає у вікно
2181 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: переповнений
  EN TS: The street is way too crowded.
  ua TS: Вулиця аж занадто переповнена.
  EN FS: The street is way too empty.
  ua FS: Вулиця аж занадто порожня.
  EN TP: a crowded neon street
  ua TP: переповнена неонова вулиця
  EN FP: a crowded train carriage
  ua FP: переповнений вагон потяга
2182 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: турист
  EN TS: The hiker has a red backpack.
  ua TS: У туриста червоний рюкзак.
  EN FS: The hiker has a blue backpack.
  ua FS: У туриста синій рюкзак.
  EN TP: a hiker on a ledge
  ua TP: турист на уступі скелі
  EN FP: a hiker in a tent
  ua FP: турист у наметі
2184 | roar (verb): to make a loud, deep angry cry | loc: ревіти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The tiger is roaring!
  ua TS: Тигр реве!
  EN FS: The lion is roaring!
  ua FS: Лев реве!
  EN TP: a roaring tiger
  ua TP: ревучий тигр
  EN FP: a sleeping tiger
  ua FP: сплячий тигр
2185 | pianist (noun): a person who plays the piano | loc: піаніст
  EN TS: The pianist has blonde hair.
  ua TS: У піаніста світле волосся.
  EN FS: The pianist has black hair.
  ua FS: У піаніста чорне волосся.
  EN TP: a pianist at the piano
  ua TP: піаніст за фортепіано
  EN FP: a pianist at a keyboard
  ua FP: піаніст за синтезатором
2186 | thorn (noun): a sharp spike growing on a plant stem | loc: колючка
  EN TS: Jesus wears a crown of thorns.
  ua TS: Ісус у вінці з колючок.
  EN FS: Jesus wears a crown of gold.
  ua FS: Ісус у вінці із золота.
  EN TP: a crown of thorns
  ua TP: вінець із колючок
  EN FP: a rose with thorns
  ua FP: троянда з колючками
2187 | buddha (noun): the founder of Buddhism, shown meditating | loc: Будда
  EN TS: Buddha is meditating.
  ua TS: Будда медитує.
  EN FS: Buddha is dancing.
  ua FS: Будда танцює.
  EN TP: Buddha meditating
  ua TP: Будда в медитації
  EN FP: Buddha lying down
  ua FP: Будда лежить
2188 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: плакати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boy is crying, Mom isn't.
  ua TS: Хлопчик плаче, мама — ні.
  EN FS: The boy is singing, Mom isn't.
  ua FS: Хлопчик співає, мама — ні.
  EN TP: crying on a bike
  ua TP: плаче на велосипеді
  EN FP: crying in bed
  ua FP: плаче в ліжку
2189 | fall overboard (phrase): to fall off a boat into the water | loc: впасти за борт
  EN TS: Someone is falling overboard!
  ua TS: Хтось падає за борт!
  EN FS: Someone is diving overboard!
  ua FS: Хтось пірнає за борт!
  EN TP: falling overboard backwards
  ua TP: падає за борт спиною
  EN FP: falling asleep in the boat
  ua FP: засинає в човні
2190 | villain (noun): an evil character in a story or film | loc: лиходій
  EN TS: This villain has flaming eyes.
  ua TS: У цього лиходія палаючі очі.
  EN FS: This villain has blue eyes.
  ua FS: У цього лиходія блакитні очі.
  EN TP: a villain in burning ruins
  ua TP: лиходій у палаючих руїнах
  EN FP: a villain in a castle
  ua FP: лиходій у замку
2191 | android (noun): a robot built to look like a human | loc: андроїд
  EN TS: The android has a human face.
  ua TS: В андроїда людське обличчя.
  EN FS: The android has a long beard.
  ua FS: В андроїда довга борода.
  EN TP: a glowing female android
  ua TP: сяюча жінка-андроїд
  EN FP: an android in a kitchen
  ua FP: андроїд на кухні
2192 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: колба
  EN TS: Harry Potter would love these flasks.
  ua TS: Гаррі Поттер оцінив би ці колби.
  EN FS: Harry Potter would love these brooms.
  ua FS: Гаррі Поттер оцінив би ці мітли.
  EN TP: glowing glass flasks
  ua TP: сяючі скляні колби
  EN FP: a thermos flask
  ua FP: термос для кави
2194 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: тропічний
  EN TS: Tropical leaves are big. Wow.
  ua TS: Тропічне листя велике. Вау.
  EN FS: Tropical leaves are tiny. Wow.
  ua FS: Тропічне листя крихітне. Вау.
  EN TP: dense tropical leaves
  ua TP: густе тропічне листя
  EN FP: a tropical beach
  ua FP: тропічний пляж
2195 | watercolor (noun): water-based paint, and pictures made with it | loc: акварель
  EN TS: The watercolor is dripping.
  ua TS: Акварель стікає.
  EN FS: The oil paint is dripping.
  ua FS: Олійна фарба стікає.
  EN TP: a watercolor portrait
  ua TP: портрет аквареллю
  EN FP: a watercolor landscape
  ua FP: пейзаж аквареллю
2199 | delicate (adjective): fine, soft and easily damaged | loc: ніжний
  EN TS: Delicate roses everywhere!
  ua TS: Ніжні троянди всюди!
  EN FS: Delicate tulips everywhere!
  ua FS: Ніжні тюльпани всюди!
  EN TP: delicate pink roses
  ua TP: ніжні рожеві троянди
  EN FP: a delicate glass vase
  ua FP: тендітна скляна ваза
2200 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: елегантний
  EN TS: She looks elegant in her gown.
  ua TS: Вона така елегантна у вечірній сукні.
  EN FS: She looks elegant in her coat.
  ua FS: Вона така елегантна в пальті.
  EN TP: an elegant flowing gown
  ua TP: елегантна довга сукня
  EN FP: an elegant black suit
  ua FP: елегантний чорний костюм
2201 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: помаранчевий
  EN TS: Her orange armour is so cool!
  ua TS: Її помаранчеві обладунки — просто вогонь!
  EN FS: Her pink armour is so cool!
  ua FS: Її рожеві обладунки — просто вогонь!
  EN TP: orange hair and armour
  ua TP: помаранчеве волосся й обладунки
  EN FP: an orange in her hand
  ua FP: апельсин у її руці
2202 | smart (adjective): neat and well-dressed, not scruffy | loc: елегантний
  EN TS: His white blazer looks smart.
  ua TS: Його білий блейзер виглядає елегантно.
  EN FS: His red blazer looks smart.
  ua FS: Його червоний блейзер виглядає елегантно.
  EN TP: a smart white blazer
  ua TP: елегантний білий блейзер
  EN FP: a smart dark suit
  ua FP: елегантний темний костюм
2204 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: ягня
  EN TS: He is holding a lamb.
  ua TS: Він тримає ягня.
  EN FS: He is holding a dog.
  ua FS: Він тримає собаку.
  EN TP: a lamb in his arms
  ua TP: ягня на руках
  EN FP: a lamb in a field
  ua FP: ягня в полі
2207 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: показувати
  EN TS: The robot hand is pointing.
  ua TS: Рука робота показує пальцем.
  EN FS: The robot hand is waving.
  ua FS: Рука робота махає.
  EN TP: pointing at a screen
  ua TP: показує на екран
  EN FP: pointing at the sky
  ua FP: показує на небо
2208 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: рожевий
  EN TS: Her hair is bright pink.
  ua TS: Її волосся яскраво-рожеве.
  EN FS: Her hair is bright green.
  ua FS: Її волосся яскраво-зелене.
  EN TP: bright pink hair
  ua TP: яскраво-рожеве волосся
  EN FP: a bright pink dress
  ua FP: яскраво-рожева сукня
2211 | trident (noun): a spear with three sharp points | loc: тризуб
  EN TS: Guess who has a trident? The sea god.
  ua TS: Вгадай, у кого тризуб? У бога моря.
  EN FS: Guess who has a hammer? The sea god.
  ua FS: Вгадай, у кого молот? У бога моря.
  EN TP: a god with a trident
  ua TP: бог із тризубом
  EN FP: a trident in the sand
  ua FP: тризуб у піску
2212 | stripes (noun): long thin lines of a different color | loc: смуги
  EN TS: Nice stripes, tiger!
  ua TS: Класні смуги, тигре!
  EN FS: Nice spots, tiger!
  ua FS: Класні плями, тигре!
  EN TP: a tiger with black stripes
  ua TP: тигр із чорними смугами
  EN FP: a zebra with black stripes
  ua FP: зебра з чорними смугами
2213 | ram (noun): a male sheep with big curved horns | loc: баран
  EN TS: Fact: rams have curly horns.
  ua TS: Факт: у баранів закручені роги.
  EN FS: Fact: rams have flat horns.
  ua FS: Факт: у баранів пласкі роги.
  EN TP: a ram with curly horns
  ua TP: баран із закрученими рогами
  EN FP: a ram eating grass
  ua FP: баран їсть траву
2214 | through (preposition): from one side of an opening to the other | loc: крізь
  EN TS: I can see a castle through it.
  ua TS: Крізь нього видно замок.
  EN FS: I can see a church through it.
  ua FS: Крізь нього видно церкву.
  EN TP: looking through a rock hole
  ua TP: погляд крізь отвір у скелі
  EN FP: looking through a window
  ua FP: погляд крізь вікно
2216 | altar (noun): a raised table where people pray | loc: вівтар
  EN TS: She is praying at an altar.
  ua TS: Вона молиться біля вівтаря.
  EN FS: She is singing at an altar.
  ua FS: Вона співає біля вівтаря.
  EN TP: praying at a candlelit altar
  ua TP: молитва біля вівтаря зі свічками
  EN FP: getting married at the altar
  ua FP: весілля біля вівтаря
2217 | spell (noun): words or power used to make magic happen | loc: заклинання
  EN TS: She's casting a spell. Cool.
  ua TS: Вона накладає заклинання. Круто.
  EN FS: She's casting a net. Cool.
  ua FS: Вона закидає сітку. Круто.
  EN TP: casting a magic spell
  ua TP: магічне заклинання
  EN FP: a spell of bad weather
  ua FP: смуга негоди
2218 | circuit (noun): the path electricity follows on a board | loc: схема
  EN TS: Circuits are all around him.
  ua TS: Навколо нього — самі схеми.
  EN FS: Flowers are all around him.
  ua FS: Навколо нього — самі квіти.
  EN TP: glowing circuit lines
  ua TP: сяючі лінії схем
  EN FP: a race circuit
  ua FP: гоночна траса
2220 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: рахувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is counting the money carefully.
  ua TS: Він уважно рахує гроші.
  EN FS: He is counting the coins carefully.
  ua FS: Він уважно рахує монети.
  EN TP: counting a stack of bills
  ua TP: рахує пачку купюр
  EN FP: counting down the seconds
  ua FP: зворотний відлік секунд
2224 | hold hands (phrase): to walk or stand with your fingers joined | loc: триматися за руки
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  ua TS: Вони тримаються за руки.
  EN FS: They are shaking hands.
  ua FS: Вони тиснуть одне одному руки.
  EN TP: holding hands in the rain
  ua TP: тримаються за руки під дощем
  EN FP: holding hands in the sun
  ua FP: тримаються за руки на сонці
2225 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: промоклий
  EN TS: Poor girl, her hair is soaked.
  ua TS: Бідолашна, її волосся геть промокле.
  EN FS: Poor girl, her hair is dry.
  ua FS: Бідолашна, її волосся геть сухе.
  EN TP: soaked in heavy rain
  ua TP: промокла під зливою
  EN FP: soaked in hot water
  ua FP: вимочене в гарячій воді
2226 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: браслет
  EN TS: He has golden bracelets.
  ua TS: У нього золоті браслети.
  EN FS: He has golden gloves.
  ua FS: У нього золоті рукавички.
  EN TP: golden bracelets on wrists
  ua TP: золоті браслети на зап'ястях
  EN FP: a bracelet in a shop
  ua FP: браслет у магазині
2227 | glance (verb): to look at something quickly | loc: кинути погляд
  EN TS: She is glancing back. At you?
  ua TS: Вона кидає погляд назад. На тебе?
  EN FS: She is glancing down. At you?
  ua FS: Вона кидає погляд униз. На тебе?
  EN TP: glancing over her shoulder
  ua TP: кидає погляд через плече
  EN FP: glancing at her phone
  ua FP: кидає погляд на телефон
2228 | above (preposition): higher than something, over it | loc: над
  EN TS: She is sitting above the city.
  ua TS: Вона сидить над містом.
  EN FS: She is sitting above the sea.
  ua FS: Вона сидить над морем.
  EN TP: high above the city
  ua TP: високо над містом
  EN FP: above the clouds
  ua FP: над хмарами
2231 | sphinx (noun): an Egyptian statue: human head, lion body | loc: сфінкс
  EN TS: A giant golden sphinx.
  ua TS: Велетенський золотий сфінкс.
  EN FS: A giant silver sphinx.
  ua FS: Велетенський срібний сфінкс.
  EN TP: a golden sphinx statue
  ua TP: золота статуя сфінкса
  EN FP: a sphinx cat sleeping
  ua FP: кіт-сфінкс спить
2232 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: спокійний
  EN TS: The Buddha looks peaceful.
  ua TS: Будда виглядає спокійним.
  EN FS: The Buddha looks angry.
  ua FS: Будда виглядає сердитим.
  EN TP: a peaceful golden Buddha
  ua TP: спокійний золотий Будда
  EN FP: a peaceful golden temple
  ua FP: спокійний золотий храм
2233 | baseball (noun): a game where you hit a ball with a bat and run | loc: бейсбол
  EN TS: She has two baseball gloves.
  ua TS: У неї дві рукавички для бейсболу.
  EN FS: She has two baseball bats.
  ua FS: У неї дві біти для бейсболу.
  EN TP: baseball gloves in both hands
  ua TP: рукавички для бейсболу в руках
  EN FP: baseball on television
  ua FP: бейсбол по телевізору
2234 | muscles (noun): the strong parts that move your body | loc: м'язи
  EN TS: The warrior has big muscles.
  ua TS: У воїна великі м'язи.
  EN FS: The warrior has a big shield.
  ua FS: У воїна великий щит.
  EN TP: a warrior's big muscles
  ua TP: великі м'язи воїна
  EN FP: a warrior's big shield
  ua FP: великий щит воїна
2235 | profile (noun): the side view of a person's face | loc: профіль
  EN TS: He is shown in full profile.
  ua TS: Його показано в повний профіль.
  EN FS: He is shown from the back.
  ua FS: Його показано зі спини.
  EN TP: a man in full profile
  ua TP: чоловік у повний профіль
  EN FP: a profile picture online
  ua FP: фото профілю в мережі
2236 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: палац
  EN TS: Palace under a huge moon. Wow!
  ua TS: Палац під величезним місяцем. Вау!
  EN FS: Palace under a huge sun. Wow!
  ua FS: Палац під величезним сонцем. Вау!
  EN TP: a palace in the mountains
  ua TP: палац у горах
  EN FP: a palace in the desert
  ua FP: палац у пустелі
2237 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: блискучий
  EN TS: Look at this shiny yellow car!
  ua TS: Глянь на цю блискучу жовту машину!
  EN FS: Look at this shiny red car!
  ua FS: Глянь на цю блискучу червону машину!
  EN TP: a shiny yellow car
  ua TP: блискуча жовта машина
  EN FP: a shiny yellow bus
  ua FP: блискучий жовтий автобус
2238 | mosque (noun): a building where Muslims go to pray | loc: мечеть
  EN TS: The mosque has many domes.
  ua TS: У мечеті багато куполів.
  EN FS: The mosque has one dome.
  ua FS: У мечеті один купол.
  EN TP: a grand mosque with domes
  ua TP: велична мечеть із куполами
  EN FP: a mosque in the desert
  ua FP: мечеть у пустелі
2242 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: зграя
  EN TS: The flock has zero free seats.
  ua TS: У зграї нуль вільних місць.
  EN FS: The flock has many free seats.
  ua FS: У зграї багато вільних місць.
  EN TP: a flock of small birds
  ua TP: зграя маленьких пташок
  EN FP: a flock of sheep
  ua FP: отара овець
2245 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: зарослий
  EN TS: It's just a bit overgrown.
  ua TS: Будиночок лише трохи зарослий.
  EN FS: It's just a bit snowy.
  ua FS: Будиночок лише трохи засніжений.
  EN TP: an overgrown cottage
  ua TP: зарослий будиночок
  EN FP: an overgrown lawn
  ua FP: зарослий газон
2246 | miniature (adjective): a very small copy of something bigger | loc: мініатюрний
  EN TS: The display features a miniature cottage.
  ua TS: На вітрині — мініатюрний котедж.
  EN FS: The display features a miniature castle.
  ua FS: На вітрині — мініатюрний замок.
  EN TP: a miniature night garden
  ua TP: мініатюрний нічний сад
  EN FP: a miniature train set
  ua FP: мініатюрна залізниця
2247 | scotland (noun): a country in the north of Great Britain | loc: Шотландія
  EN TS: Scotland has a lonely church.
  ua TS: У Шотландії є самотня церква.
  EN FS: Scotland has a lonely castle.
  ua FS: У Шотландії є самотній замок.
  EN TP: a church in Scotland
  ua TP: церква в Шотландії
  EN FP: a castle in Scotland
  ua FP: замок у Шотландії
2248 | graceful (adjective): moving in a smooth, beautiful, elegant way | loc: граційний
  EN TS: She is floating gracefully.
  ua TS: Вона ширяє, така граційна.
  EN FS: She is dancing gracefully.
  ua FS: Вона танцює, така граційна.
  EN TP: floating gracefully in the air
  ua TP: граційний політ у повітрі
  EN FP: a graceful dance on stage
  ua FP: граційний танець на сцені
2249 | steampunk (adjective): a fantasy style of old brass machines and gears | loc: стімпанк
  EN TS: A steampunk city of gears.
  ua TS: Стімпанк-місто з шестерень.
  EN FS: A steampunk city of glass.
  ua FS: Стімпанк-місто зі скла.
  EN TP: brass steampunk towers
  ua TP: латунні стімпанк-вежі
  EN FP: a steampunk costume party
  ua FP: стімпанк-вечірка в костюмах
2250 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: вдивлятися
  EN TS: She is gazing at the city.
  ua TS: Вона вдивляється в місто.
  EN FS: She is gazing at the sea.
  ua FS: Вона вдивляється в море.
  EN TP: gazing at a rainy city
  ua TP: вдивляється в дощове місто
  EN FP: gazing at a starry sky
  ua FP: вдивляється в зоряне небо
2251 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: шати
  EN TS: Heaven's dress code: a white robe.
  ua TS: Дрес-код раю: білі шати.
  EN FS: Heaven's dress code: a black robe.
  ua FS: Дрес-код раю: чорні шати.
  EN TP: a long white robe
  ua TP: довгі білі шати
  EN FP: a robe with a hood
  ua FP: шати з каптуром
2254 | frozen (adjective): turned to ice or completely covered in ice | loc: замерзлий
  EN TS: A frozen palace. Hi, Elsa!
  ua TS: Замерзлий палац. Привіт, Ельзо!
  EN FS: A frozen lake. Hi, Elsa!
  ua FS: Замерзле озеро. Привіт, Ельзо!
  EN TP: a frozen snowy palace
  ua TP: замерзлий засніжений палац
  EN FP: frozen peas in a bag
  ua FP: заморожений горошок у пакеті
2256 | mechanical (adjective): made of machine parts and worked by machine | loc: механічний
  EN TS: Her legs are fully mechanical.
  ua TS: Її ноги повністю механічні.
  EN FS: Her legs are fully wooden.
  ua FS: Її ноги повністю дерев'яні.
  EN TP: mechanical arms and legs
  ua TP: механічні руки й ноги
  EN FP: a mechanical watch
  ua FP: механічний годинник
2257 | eyebrows (noun): the lines of hair above your eyes | loc: брови
  EN TS: Her eyebrows are very dark.
  ua TS: Її брови дуже темні.
  EN FS: Her eyebrows are very light.
  ua FS: Її брови дуже світлі.
  EN TP: thick dark eyebrows
  ua TP: густі темні брови
  EN FP: thin blond eyebrows
  ua FP: тонкі світлі брови
2258 | spire (noun): a tall thin pointed top on a tower | loc: шпиль
  EN TS: The church has a tall spire.
  ua TS: У церкви високий шпиль.
  EN FS: The church has a round dome.
  ua FS: У церкви круглий купол.
  EN TP: a tall church spire
  ua TP: високий шпиль церкви
  EN FP: a spire on a castle
  ua FP: шпиль на замку
2259 | lagoon (noun): a calm pool of sea water behind rocks | loc: лагуна
  EN TS: Take me to this lagoon now!
  ua TS: Забери мене в цю лагуну просто зараз!
  EN FS: Take me to this glacier now!
  ua FS: Забери мене на цей льодовик просто зараз!
  EN TP: a turquoise lagoon with palms
  ua TP: бірюзова лагуна з пальмами
  EN FP: a frozen lagoon in winter
  ua FP: замерзла лагуна взимку
2260 | rowboat (noun): a small open boat moved with oars | loc: весловий човен
  EN TS: Poor rowboat, nobody wants it.
  ua TS: Бідний весловий човен, нікому не потрібен.
  EN FS: Poor ship, nobody wants it.
  ua FS: Бідний корабель, нікому не потрібен.
  EN TP: an empty wooden rowboat
  ua TP: порожній дерев'яний весловий човен
  EN FP: a rowboat full of people
  ua FP: весловий човен, повний людей
2262 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: з'єднувати
  EN TS: Dots and lines connect them.
  ua TS: Точки й лінії з'єднують їх.
  EN FS: Dots and lines divide them.
  ua FS: Точки й лінії розділяють їх.
  EN TP: lines connecting two people
  ua TP: лінії з'єднують двох людей
  EN FP: a cable connecting a phone
  ua FP: кабель до телефона
2268 | tightrope (noun): a rope stretched high for acrobats to cross | loc: канат
  EN TS: She is on a tightrope. No net!
  ua TS: Вона на канаті. Без сітки!
  EN FS: She is on a ladder. No net!
  ua FS: Вона на драбині. Без сітки!
  EN TP: balancing on a tightrope
  ua TP: балансує на канаті
  EN FP: a circus tightrope act
  ua FP: цирковий номер на канаті
2269 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: блузка
  EN TS: Her blouse is loose and white.
  ua TS: Її блузка вільна й біла.
  EN FS: Her dress is loose and white.
  ua FS: Її сукня вільна й біла.
  EN TP: a loose white blouse
  ua TP: вільна біла блузка
  EN FP: a tight black blouse
  ua FP: облягаюча чорна блузка
2271 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: коридор
  EN TS: She is chilling in a corridor.
  ua TS: Вона чілить у коридорі.
  EN FS: She is chilling in a kitchen.
  ua FS: Вона чілить на кухні.
  EN TP: a spaceship corridor
  ua TP: коридор космічного корабля
  EN FP: a hospital corridor
  ua FP: лікарняний коридор
2273 | jeans (noun): trousers made of strong blue cotton | loc: джинси
  EN TS: Ripped jeans, full denim look.
  ua TS: Рвані джинси, денім з голови до п'ят.
  EN FS: Ripped jeans, full black look.
  ua FS: Рвані джинси, чорне з голови до п'ят.
  EN TP: heavily ripped blue jeans
  ua TP: дуже рвані сині джинси
  EN FP: ironing blue jeans
  ua FP: прасування синіх джинсів
2274 | lace (noun): fine cloth with open patterns of threads | loc: мереживо
  EN TS: That lace collar is so fancy!
  ua TS: Комір із мережива — такий шикарний!
  EN FS: That fur collar is so fancy!
  ua FS: Комір із хутра — такий шикарний!
  EN TP: an ornate lace collar
  ua TP: вишуканий комір із мережива
  EN FP: tying a shoe lace
  ua FP: зав'язування шнурків
2275 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: образ
  EN TS: Nice outfit, big sneakers!
  ua TS: Класний образ, величезні кросівки!
  EN FS: Nice outfit, tiny sneakers!
  ua FS: Класний образ, крихітні кросівки!
  EN TP: a street style outfit
  ua TP: вуличний образ
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  ua FP: образ для весілля
2278 | look up (phrase): to raise your eyes to see something above | loc: дивитися вгору
  EN TS: He is looking up at the sky.
  ua TS: Він дивиться вгору на небо.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  ua FS: Він дивиться вгору на літак.
  EN TP: to look up at clouds
  ua TP: дивитися вгору на хмари
  EN FP: to look up a word
  ua FP: шукати слово в словнику
2280 | embrace (verb): to put your arms around someone | loc: обіймати
  EN TS: He is embracing her at sunset.
  ua TS: Він обіймає її на заході сонця.
  EN FS: He is embracing her in a car.
  ua FS: Він обіймає її в машині.
  EN TP: embracing on a sailing boat
  ua TP: обіймаються на вітрильнику
  EN FP: embracing a new idea
  ua FP: прийняти нову ідею
2282 | sailing (noun): the sport of travelling on a boat with wind power | loc: вітрильний спорт
  EN TS: Sailing at sunset. So chill.
  ua TS: Вітрильний спорт на заході сонця. Такий чіл.
  EN FS: Surfing at sunset. So chill.
  ua FS: Серфінг на заході сонця. Такий чіл.
  EN TP: sailing at sunset
  ua TP: вітрильний спорт на заході
  EN FP: sailing in a storm
  ua FP: вітрильний спорт у шторм
2284 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: зачіска
  EN TS: Feathers? Bold hairstyle.
  ua TS: Пір'я? Смілива зачіска.
  EN FS: Pearls? Bold hairstyle.
  ua FS: Перли? Смілива зачіска.
  EN TP: a hairstyle of feathers
  ua TP: зачіска з пір'я
  EN FP: a short hairstyle
  ua FP: коротка зачіска
2285 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: світшот
  EN TS: Her sweatshirt is huge.
  ua TS: Її світшот величезний.
  EN FS: Her backpack is huge.
  ua FS: Її рюкзак величезний.
  EN TP: a big blue sweatshirt
  ua TP: великий синій світшот
  EN FP: a sweatshirt on a chair
  ua FP: світшот на стільці
2287 | grief (noun): deep sadness, especially after losing someone | loc: горе
  EN TS: He is sitting alone in grief.
  ua TS: Він сидить сам, у горі.
  EN FS: He is sitting alone in a car.
  ua FS: Він сидить сам, у машині.
  EN TP: grief in a dark garden
  ua TP: горе в темному саду
  EN FP: grief at a funeral
  ua FP: горе на похороні
2288 | crop top (noun): a short top that leaves the stomach bare | loc: кроп-топ
  EN TS: Crop top at the marina.
  ua TS: Кроп-топ на яхтовій пристані.
  EN FS: Crop top at the ski resort.
  ua FS: Кроп-топ на гірськолижному курорті.
  EN TP: a black crop top
  ua TP: чорний кроп-топ
  EN FP: a white crop top
  ua FP: білий кроп-топ
2291 | asteroid (noun): a rock that flies through space | loc: астероїд
  EN TS: Just a few asteroids. Relax.
  ua TS: Лише кілька астероїдів. Розслабся.
  EN FS: Just a few birds. Relax.
  ua FS: Лише кілька пташок. Розслабся.
  EN TP: floating asteroids
  ua TP: астероїди, що ширяють
  EN FP: an asteroid hitting Earth
  ua FP: астероїд врізається в Землю
2295 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: рукав
  EN TS: Those sleeves are enormous!
  ua TS: Ці рукави величезні!
  EN FS: Those boots are enormous!
  ua FS: Ці чоботи величезні!
  EN TP: wide white sleeves
  ua TP: широкі білі рукави
  EN FP: short black sleeves
  ua FP: короткі чорні рукави
2296 | floral (adjective): decorated with a flower pattern | loc: квітчастий
  EN TS: Her floral dress matches the wall!
  ua TS: Її квітчаста сукня пасує до стіни!
  EN FS: Her striped dress matches the wall!
  ua FS: Її смугаста сукня пасує до стіни!
  EN TP: an orange floral dress
  ua TP: помаранчева квітчаста сукня
  EN FP: a floral beach shirt
  ua FP: квітчаста пляжна сорочка
2297 | shore (noun): the land along the edge of the sea or a lake | loc: берег
  EN TS: Waves are hitting the shore.
  ua TS: Хвилі б'ються об берег.
  EN FS: Waves are hitting the boat.
  ua FS: Хвилі б'ються об човен.
  EN TP: palm trees on the shore
  ua TP: пальми на березі
  EN FP: a boat on the shore
  ua FP: човен на березі
2300 | on fire (phrase): burning with flames | loc: у вогні
  EN TS: The guitar is on fire!
  ua TS: Гітара у вогні!
  EN FS: The piano is on fire!
  ua FS: Піаніно у вогні!
  EN TP: a guitar on fire
  ua TP: гітара у вогні
  EN FP: a house on fire
  ua FP: будинок у вогні
2301 | launch (verb): to send a rocket up into space | loc: запускати
  EN TS: The shuttle is being launched.
  ua TS: Шатл запускають.
  EN FS: The plane is being launched.
  ua FS: Літак запускають.
  EN TP: launching a space shuttle
  ua TP: запускають космічний шатл
  EN FP: launching a new product
  ua FP: запускають новий продукт
2302 | weightless (adjective): floating freely because gravity does not pull | loc: невагомий
  EN TS: He is weightless and relaxed.
  ua TS: Він невагомий і розслаблений.
  EN FS: He is weightless and scared.
  ua FS: Він невагомий і наляканий.
  EN TP: a weightless astronaut
  ua TP: невагомий астронавт
  EN FP: a weightless feather
  ua FP: невагома пір'їна
2305 | rocky (adjective): covered with rocks and stones | loc: скелястий
  EN TS: A rocky road to a lighthouse.
  ua TS: Скелястий шлях до маяка.
  EN FS: A rocky road to a castle.
  ua FS: Скелястий шлях до замку.
  EN TP: a rocky headland
  ua TP: скелястий мис
  EN FP: a rocky beach with sunbeds
  ua FP: скелястий пляж із шезлонгами
2306 | countryside (noun): land with fields and villages, away from towns | loc: сільська місцевість
  EN TS: The countryside never ends.
  ua TS: Сільській місцевості немає кінця.
  EN FS: The city never ends.
  ua FS: Місту немає кінця.
  EN TP: kids in the countryside
  ua TP: діти в сільській місцевості
  EN FP: kids leaving the countryside
  ua FP: діти покидають село
2308 | viking (noun): a warrior sailor from old Scandinavia | loc: вікінг
  EN TS: The viking is holding a blade.
  ua TS: Вікінг тримає клинок.
  EN FS: The viking is holding an axe.
  ua FS: Вікінг тримає сокиру.
  EN TP: a viking in fur
  ua TP: вікінг у хутрі
  EN FP: a viking on a ship
  ua FP: вікінг на кораблі
2310 | melody (noun): a line of musical notes that makes a tune | loc: мелодія
  EN TS: A melody rises from the piano.
  ua TS: Мелодія лине з піаніно.
  EN FS: A melody rises from the drum.
  ua FS: Мелодія лине з барабана.
  EN TP: a golden melody rising
  ua TP: золота мелодія злітає
  EN FP: a golden melody falling
  ua FP: золота мелодія падає
2311 | stained glass (noun): coloured glass pieces forming a picture | loc: вітраж
  EN TS: The stained glass is huge.
  ua TS: Вітраж величезний.
  EN FS: The stained glass is tiny.
  ua FS: Вітраж крихітний.
  EN TP: tall stained glass windows
  ua TP: високі вітражі
  EN FP: a stained glass lamp
  ua FP: лампа з вітражем
2312 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: гоночний автомобіль
  EN TS: A race car by the palm trees.
  ua TS: Гоночний автомобіль біля пальм.
  EN FS: A race car by the pine trees.
  ua FS: Гоночний автомобіль біля сосен.
  EN TP: a red race car
  ua TP: червоний гоночний автомобіль
  EN FP: a red race horse
  ua FP: червоний скаковий кінь
2313 | camper van (noun): a van you can travel and sleep in | loc: автодім
  EN TS: Home is where the camper van is.
  ua TS: Дім там, де автодім.
  EN FS: Home is where the orange tent is.
  ua FS: Дім там, де помаранчевий намет.
  EN TP: an orange camper van
  ua TP: помаранчевий автодім
  EN FP: a camper van in town
  ua FP: автодім у місті
2314 | ghost (noun): the spirit of a dead person | loc: привид
  EN TS: The ghost's costume: one old sheet.
  ua TS: Костюм привида: одне старе простирадло.
  EN FS: The ghost's costume: one old towel.
  ua FS: Костюм привида: один старий рушник.
  EN TP: a white sheet ghost
  ua TP: привид із білого простирадла
  EN FP: a ghost in a castle
  ua FP: привид у замку
2315 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: краєвид
  EN TS: This landscape is paper!
  ua TS: Цей краєвид із паперу!
  EN FS: This landscape is glass!
  ua FS: Цей краєвид зі скла!
  EN TP: a paper landscape
  ua TP: паперовий краєвид
  EN FP: a landscape photo
  ua FP: фото краєвиду
2317 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: каптур
  EN TS: Her red hood is up.
  ua TS: Її червоний каптур накинутий.
  EN FS: Her red hood is down.
  ua FS: Її червоний каптур знятий.
  EN TP: a red hood pulled up
  ua TP: накинутий червоний каптур
  EN FP: the hood of a car
  ua FP: капот машини
2318 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: меч
  EN TS: She has a very long sword.
  ua TS: У неї дуже довгий меч.
  EN FS: She has a very long spear.
  ua FS: У неї дуже довгий спис.
  EN TP: a long curved sword
  ua TP: довгий вигнутий меч
  EN FP: a long straight sword
  ua FP: довгий прямий меч
2322 | broken (adjective): cracked or in pieces, no longer whole | loc: розбитий
  EN TS: The glass is broken!
  ua TS: Скло розбите!
  EN FS: The clock is broken!
  ua FS: Годинник розбитий!
  EN TP: a broken mirror portrait
  ua TP: портрет у розбитому дзеркалі
  EN FP: a broken arm in plaster
  ua FP: зламана рука в гіпсі
2324 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: співати
  EN TS: He is singing like a star!
  ua TS: Він співає, як зірка!
  EN FS: He is dancing like a star!
  ua FS: Він танцює, як зірка!
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  ua TP: співає в мікрофон
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  ua FP: співає в душі
2326 | prince (noun): the son of a king or queen | loc: принц
  EN TS: The prince has cool blue hair.
  ua TS: У принца класне синє волосся.
  EN FS: The prince has cool pink hair.
  ua FS: У принца класне рожеве волосся.
  EN TP: a prince with a crown
  ua TP: принц у короні
  EN FP: a prince on a horse
  ua FP: принц на коні
2327 | palm tree (noun): a tall tree with no branches and big top leaves | loc: пальма
  EN TS: This car and the palm trees look so cool.
  ua TS: Ця тачка й пальми — просто топ.
  EN FS: This bike and the palm trees look so cool.
  ua FS: Цей байк і пальми — просто топ.
  EN TP: palm trees at sunset
  ua TP: пальми на заході сонця
  EN FP: palm trees on an island
  ua FP: пальми на острові
2328 | throne (noun): the decorated chair of a king or queen | loc: трон
  EN TS: Such a "humble" throne!
  ua TS: Такий «скромний» трон!
  EN FS: Such a "humble" bed!
  ua FS: Таке «скромне» ліжко!
  EN TP: a huge golden throne
  ua TP: величезний золотий трон
  EN FP: an empty golden throne
  ua FP: порожній золотий трон
2330 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: давати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She wants to give you flowers.
  ua TS: Вона хоче дати тобі квіти.
  EN FS: She wants to give you a cake.
  ua FS: Вона хоче дати тобі торт.
  EN TP: giving three yellow flowers
  ua TP: дає три жовті квітки
  EN FP: giving red roses
  ua FP: дає червоні троянди
2333 | in love (phrase): having strong romantic feelings for someone | loc: закоханий
  EN TS: They are so in love!
  ua TS: Вони такі закохані!
  EN FS: They are so angry!
  ua FS: Вони такі сердиті!
  EN TP: in love under autumn leaves
  ua TP: закохані під осіннім листям
  EN FP: in love on a beach
  ua FP: закохані на пляжі
2340 | strange (adjective): unusual and hard to understand | loc: дивний
  EN TS: This house is a bit strange.
  ua TS: Цей будинок трохи дивний.
  EN FS: This car is a bit strange.
  ua FS: Ця машина трохи дивна.
  EN TP: a strange tall house
  ua TP: дивний високий будинок
  EN FP: a strange old boat
  ua FP: дивний старий човен
2341 | death (noun): the end of a living thing's life | loc: смерть
  EN TS: Flowers make death look pretty.
  ua TS: Із квітами смерть виглядає гарненько.
  EN FS: Candles make death look pretty.
  ua FS: Зі свічками смерть виглядає гарненько.
  EN TP: death among flowers
  ua TP: смерть серед квітів
  EN FP: death in a car crash
  ua FP: смерть в автокатастрофі
2344 | crooked (adjective): bent and leaning, not straight | loc: кривий
  EN TS: The houses are a bit crooked.
  ua TS: Будинки трохи криві.
  EN FS: The trees are a bit crooked.
  ua FS: Дерева трохи криві.
  EN TP: tall crooked houses
  ua TP: високі криві будинки
  EN FP: a crooked picture frame
  ua FP: крива рамка для картини
2345 | wizard (noun): a man in stories who can do magic | loc: чарівник
  EN TS: What a long wizard beard!
  ua TS: Яка довга борода в чарівника!
  EN FS: What a short wizard beard!
  ua FS: Яка коротка борода в чарівника!
  EN TP: an old wizard in grey
  ua TP: старий чарівник у сірому
  EN FP: an old wizard in red
  ua FP: старий чарівник у червоному
2347 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: досліджувати
  EN TS: He is exploring an exoplanet.
  ua TS: Він досліджує екзопланету.
  EN FS: He is exploring a deep cave.
  ua FS: Він досліджує глибоку печеру.
  EN TP: exploring an alien world
  ua TP: досліджує чужий світ
  EN FP: exploring an old castle
  ua FP: досліджує старий замок
2349 | dress up (phrase): to put on a costume to look like someone else | loc: перевдягатися в костюм
  EN TS: Even the cat dressed up!
  ua TS: Навіть кіт перевдягнувся в костюм!
  EN FS: Even the dog dressed up!
  ua FS: Навіть пес перевдягнувся в костюм!
  EN TP: dressed up as witches
  ua TP: перевдягнені у відьом
  EN FP: dressed up as pirates
  ua FP: перевдягнені в піратів
2350 | carve (verb): to cut a shape into something hard | loc: вирізьблювати
  EN TS: Somebody carved faces! Wow!
  ua TS: Хтось вирізьбив обличчя! Вау!
  EN FS: Somebody carved names! Wow!
  ua FS: Хтось вирізьбив імена! Вау!
  EN TP: carved pumpkin faces
  ua TP: вирізьблені обличчя на гарбузах
  EN FP: carved wooden faces
  ua FP: вирізьблені дерев'яні обличчя
2351 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: керувати автомобілем
  EN TS: Someone is driving a green car.
  ua TS: Хтось керує зеленим автомобілем.
  EN FS: Someone is driving a yellow car.
  ua FS: Хтось керує жовтим автомобілем.
  EN TP: to drive through autumn
  ua TP: їхати крізь осінь
  EN FP: to drive through the snow
  ua FP: їхати крізь сніг
2353 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: велетенський
  EN TS: The mushrooms are giant, bro.
  ua TS: Гриби велетенські, бро.
  EN FS: The mushrooms are tiny, bro.
  ua FS: Гриби крихітні, бро.
  EN TP: giant pink mushrooms
  ua TP: велетенські рожеві гриби
  EN FP: giant pink flowers
  ua FP: велетенські рожеві квіти
2354 | headdress (noun): a decorated head covering for ceremonies | loc: головний убір
  EN TS: A huge golden headdress!
  ua TS: Величезний золотий головний убір!
  EN FS: A huge silver headdress!
  ua FS: Величезний срібний головний убір!
  EN TP: a huge golden headdress
  ua TP: величезний золотий головний убір
  EN FP: taking off a headdress
  ua FP: знімає головний убір
2356 | toward (preposition): in the direction of something | loc: до
  EN TS: The road leads toward a planet.
  ua TS: Дорога веде до планети.
  EN FS: The road leads toward a castle.
  ua FS: Дорога веде до замку.
  EN TP: toward a huge planet
  ua TP: до величезної планети
  EN FP: toward a huge city
  ua FP: до величезного міста
2357 | black and white (phrase): with no colors, only dark and light shades | loc: чорно-білий
  EN TS: The house is black and white.
  ua TS: Будинок чорно-білий.
  EN FS: The house is red and white.
  ua FS: Будинок червоно-білий.
  EN TP: a black and white drawing
  ua TP: чорно-білий малюнок
  EN FP: a black and white film
  ua FP: чорно-білий фільм
2358 | farm (noun): land where people grow food and keep animals | loc: ферма
  EN TS: The farm has red roofs.
  ua TS: На фермі червоні дахи.
  EN FS: The farm has blue roofs.
  ua FS: На фермі сині дахи.
  EN TP: a farm on a hillside
  ua TP: ферма на схилі пагорба
  EN FP: a farm with cows
  ua FP: ферма з коровами
2359 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: традиційний
  EN TS: They wear traditional dress.
  ua TS: Вони в традиційному вбранні.
  EN FS: They wear modern dress.
  ua FS: Вони в сучасному вбранні.
  EN TP: traditional Indian dress
  ua TP: традиційне індійське вбрання
  EN FP: a traditional wedding cake
  ua FP: традиційний весільний торт
2360 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: швидкий
  EN TS: That red car looks crazy fast.
  ua TS: Ця червона тачка виглядає шалено швидкою.
  EN FS: That red van looks crazy fast.
  ua FS: Цей червоний фургон виглядає шалено швидким.
  EN TP: a fast red car
  ua TP: швидка червона машина
  EN FP: a fast red boat
  ua FP: швидкий червоний човен
2363 | mysterious (adjective): strange and hard to explain | loc: загадковий
  EN TS: She's turning into mysterious smoke.
  ua TS: Вона перетворюється на загадковий дим.
  EN FS: She's turning into mysterious water.
  ua FS: Вона перетворюється на загадкову воду.
  EN TP: a mysterious smoky woman
  ua TP: загадкова жінка з диму
  EN FP: a mysterious locked door
  ua FP: загадкові замкнені двері
2364 | bull (noun): a large male animal of the cow family | loc: бик
  EN TS: A white bull is behind him.
  ua TS: За ним стоїть білий бик.
  EN FS: A white horse is behind him.
  ua FS: За ним стоїть білий кінь.
  EN TP: a bull with curved horns
  ua TP: бик із вигнутими рогами
  EN FP: a bull in a ring
  ua FP: бик на арені
2365 | metal (noun): a hard shiny material like iron or steel | loc: метал
  EN TS: His metal suit is so shiny.
  ua TS: Його костюм із металу аж сяє.
  EN FS: His metal suit is so dirty.
  ua FS: Його костюм із металу геть брудний.
  EN TP: a red metal suit
  ua TP: червоний костюм із металу
  EN FP: a red metal car
  ua FP: червона металева машина
2367 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: брудний
  EN TS: This car is a little dirty.
  ua TS: Ця машина трохи брудна.
  EN FS: This bus is a little dirty.
  ua FS: Цей автобус трохи брудний.
  EN TP: an old dirty sports car
  ua TP: старе брудне спортивне авто
  EN FP: a dirty old bus
  ua FP: брудний старий автобус
2368 | paradise (noun): a perfect place where all is wonderful | loc: рай
  EN TS: This beach is total paradise.
  ua TS: Цей пляж — справжній рай.
  EN FS: This desert is total paradise.
  ua FS: Ця пустеля — справжній рай.
  EN TP: a tropical paradise at sunset
  ua TP: тропічний рай на заході сонця
  EN FP: a paradise for skiers
  ua FP: рай для лижників
2371 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: скорбота
  EN TS: The angel is lost in sorrow.
  ua TS: Ангел поринув у скорботу.
  EN FS: The angel is lost in a book.
  ua FS: Ангел поринув у книжку.
  EN TP: an angel full of sorrow
  ua TP: ангел, сповнений скорботи
  EN FP: an angel full of joy
  ua FP: ангел, сповнений радості
2372 | exhausted (adjective): extremely tired with no energy left | loc: виснажений
  EN TS: He looks totally exhausted.
  ua TS: Він виглядає геть виснаженим.
  EN FS: He looks totally excited.
  ua FS: Він виглядає геть захопленим.
  EN TP: an exhausted worker
  ua TP: виснажений працівник
  EN FP: an exhausted phone battery
  ua FP: розряджена батарея телефона
2373 | universe (noun): all of space with its stars and planets | loc: Всесвіт
  EN TS: The universe looks crowded.
  ua TS: Всесвіт виглядає переповненим.
  EN FS: The universe looks empty.
  ua FS: Всесвіт виглядає порожнім.
  EN TP: a universe full of planets
  ua TP: Всесвіт, повний планет
  EN FP: a universe without stars
  ua FP: Всесвіт без зірок
2375 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: половина
  EN TS: Half grey, half yellow. It cannot decide.
  ua TS: Половина сіра, половина жовта. Не може визначитися.
  EN FS: Half grey, half green. It cannot decide.
  ua FS: Половина сіра, половина зелена. Не може визначитися.
  EN TP: half a yellow car
  ua TP: половина жовтої машини
  EN FP: half a yellow bus
  ua FP: половина жовтого автобуса
2378 | relax (verb): to calm down and let your body feel loose | loc: розслаблятися
  EN TS: She is totally relaxing now.
  ua TS: Вона зараз на повну розслабляється.
  EN FS: She is totally running now.
  ua FS: Вона зараз на повну бігає.
  EN TP: relaxing under the moon
  ua TP: розслабляється під місяцем
  EN FP: relaxing on the beach
  ua FP: розслабляється на пляжі
2379 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: падати
  EN TS: Red leaves are falling.
  ua TS: Червоне листя падає.
  EN FS: Red apples are falling.
  ua FS: Червоні яблука падають.
  EN TP: leaves falling in the rain
  ua TP: листя падає під дощем
  EN FP: snow falling on cars
  ua FP: сніг падає на машини
2380 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: втекти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The car is escaping the fire!
  ua TS: Машина тікає від вогню!
  EN FS: The car is escaping the flood!
  ua FS: Машина тікає від повені!
  EN TP: escaping a burning forest
  ua TP: втеча з палаючого лісу
  EN FP: escaping a burning house
  ua FP: втеча з палаючого будинку
2381 | claws (noun): the sharp curved nails on an animal's feet | loc: пазурі
  EN TS: Those claws are really sharp!
  ua TS: Ці пазурі реально гострі!
  EN FS: Those teeth are really sharp!
  ua FS: Ці зуби реально гострі!
  EN TP: claws on a branch
  ua TP: пазурі на гілці
  EN FP: claws on a cat
  ua FP: пазурі кота
2382 | scales (noun): the hard shiny plates on a fish's skin | loc: луска
  EN TS: Look, her tail has blue scales.
  ua TS: Дивись, у неї на хвості синя луска.
  EN FS: Look, her tail has pink scales.
  ua FS: Дивись, у неї на хвості рожева луска.
  EN TP: a tail with blue scales
  ua TP: хвіст із синьою лускою
  EN FP: weighing on the scales
  ua FP: зважування на вагах
2383 | gem (noun): a beautiful precious stone used in jewellery | loc: самоцвіт
  EN TS: Fire and gems everywhere!
  ua TS: Вогонь і самоцвіти всюди!
  EN FS: Ice and gems everywhere!
  ua FS: Лід і самоцвіти всюди!
  EN TP: sparkling colorful gems
  ua TP: барвисті блискучі самоцвіти
  EN FP: gems in a dark cave
  ua FP: самоцвіти в темній печері
2384 | kingdom (noun): a land that a king or queen rules | loc: королівство
  EN TS: A tiny kingdom on a hill.
  ua TS: Крихітне королівство на пагорбі.
  EN FS: A tiny kingdom on an island.
  ua FS: Крихітне королівство на острові.
  EN TP: a storybook kingdom
  ua TP: казкове королівство
  EN FP: the animal kingdom
  ua FP: тваринне царство
2385 | alien (adjective): coming from another planet, not from Earth | loc: інопланетний
  EN TS: A purple alien landscape.
  ua TS: Фіолетовий інопланетний краєвид.
  EN FS: A green alien landscape.
  ua FS: Зелений інопланетний краєвид.
  EN TP: a purple alien world
  ua TP: фіолетовий інопланетний світ
  EN FP: an alien in a spaceship
  ua FP: прибулець у космічному кораблі
2386 | railing (noun): a fence of bars you hold onto | loc: поручні
  EN TS: The railing faces the sunset.
  ua TS: Поручні дивляться на захід сонця.
  EN FS: The railing faces a mountain.
  ua FS: Поручні дивляться на гору.
  EN TP: a metal balcony railing
  ua TP: металеві поручні балкона
  EN FP: a railing on a staircase
  ua FP: поручні на сходах
2387 | twisted (adjective): bent and turned in many directions | loc: покручений
  EN TS: The tree is twisted. Cool.
  ua TS: Дерево покручене. Круто.
  EN FS: The tree is straight. Cool.
  ua FS: Дерево пряме. Круто.
  EN TP: a twisted old tree
  ua TP: старе покручене дерево
  EN FP: a twisted metal fence
  ua FP: покручений металевий паркан
2388 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: геймер
  EN TS: This gamer loves pink.
  ua TS: Цей геймер обожнює рожеве.
  EN FS: This gamer loves green.
  ua FS: Цей геймер обожнює зелене.
  EN TP: a gamer in pink
  ua TP: геймер у рожевому
  EN FP: a gamer in blue
  ua FP: геймер у синьому
2389 | faith (noun): a strong belief in God or a religion | loc: віра
  EN TS: She is praying with faith.
  ua TS: Вона молиться з вірою.
  EN FS: She is praying with open arms.
  ua FS: Вона молиться з розкинутими руками.
  EN TP: praying with deep faith
  ua TP: молиться з глибокою вірою
  EN FP: losing her faith
  ua FP: втрачає віру
2390 | stylish (adjective): dressed in a fashionable, attractive way | loc: стильний
  EN TS: So stylish on a beach!
  ua TS: Така стильна на пляжі!
  EN FS: So stylish on a ship!
  ua FS: Така стильна на кораблі!
  EN TP: a stylish beach look
  ua TP: стильний пляжний образ
  EN FP: a stylish winter coat
  ua FP: стильне зимове пальто
2391 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: краєвид
  EN TS: Epic scenery, red sky.
  ua TS: Епічний краєвид, червоне небо.
  EN FS: Epic scenery, blue sky.
  ua FS: Епічний краєвид, синє небо.
  EN TP: scenery with a huge moon
  ua TP: краєвид із величезним місяцем
  EN FP: scenery for a school play
  ua FP: декорації до шкільної вистави
2392 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: прогулянка
  EN TS: A stroll in a straw hat? Stylish.
  ua TS: Прогулянка в солом'яному капелюсі? Стильно.
  EN FS: A stroll in a red hat? Stylish.
  ua FS: Прогулянка в червоному капелюсі? Стильно.
  EN TP: a stroll among flowers
  ua TP: прогулянка серед квітів
  EN FP: a stroll on the beach
  ua FP: прогулянка пляжем
2393 | high heels (noun): shoes with a tall thin part under the back | loc: туфлі на високих підборах
  EN TS: Office look with high heels.
  ua TS: Офісний образ із туфлями на високих підборах.
  EN FS: Office look with trainers.
  ua FS: Офісний образ із кросівками.
  EN TP: black strappy high heels
  ua TP: чорні туфлі на високих підборах
  EN FP: high heels in a box
  ua FP: туфлі на підборах у коробці
2394 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: вибирати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He has to choose a road.
  ua TS: Йому треба вибрати дорогу.
  EN FS: He has to choose a boat.
  ua FS: Йому треба вибрати човен.
  EN TP: choosing the right road
  ua TP: вибирає правильну дорогу
  EN FP: choosing the right dress
  ua FP: вибирає правильну сукню
2395 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: жилет
  EN TS: His vest has gold buttons.
  ua TS: На його жилеті золоті ґудзики.
  EN FS: His vest has silver buttons.
  ua FS: На його жилеті срібні ґудзики.
  EN TP: a black leather vest
  ua TP: чорний шкіряний жилет
  EN FP: a vest under a jacket
  ua FP: жилет під піджаком
2396 | corset (noun): a tight laced top that shapes the waist | loc: корсет
  EN TS: That laced corset is stunning.
  ua TS: Цей корсет на шнурівці — просто неймовірний.
  EN FS: That laced glove is stunning.
  ua FS: Ця рукавичка на шнурівці — просто неймовірна.
  EN TP: a laced corset
  ua TP: корсет на шнурівці
  EN FP: laced boots
  ua FP: черевики на шнурівці
2397 | gloomy (adjective): dark and sad, without light or cheer | loc: похмурий
  EN TS: This room is so gloomy!
  ua TS: Ця кімната така похмура!
  EN FS: This room is so sunny!
  ua FS: Ця кімната така сонячна!
  EN TP: a gloomy gothic room
  ua TP: похмура готична кімната
  EN FP: a gloomy rainy day
  ua FP: похмурий дощовий день
2398 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: тераса
  EN TS: The terrace offers sea views.
  ua TS: З тераси відкривається вид на море.
  EN FS: The terrace offers city views.
  ua FS: З тераси відкривається вид на місто.
  EN TP: a tiled seaside terrace
  ua TP: кахляна тераса біля моря
  EN FP: a terrace in the mountains
  ua FP: тераса в горах
2400 | fierce (adjective): violent, angry and frightening to look at | loc: лютий
  EN TS: That's one fierce viking!
  ua TS: Оце лютий вікінг!
  EN FS: That's one fierce pirate!
  ua FS: Оце лютий пірат!
  EN TP: a fierce angry stare
  ua TP: лютий сердитий погляд
  EN FP: a fierce storm at sea
  ua FP: лютий шторм на морі
2401 | fantasy (noun): an imagined magical world, not real life | loc: фантазія
  EN TS: A path into a fantasy world.
  ua TS: Стежка у світ фантазії.
  EN FS: A path into a busy city.
  ua FS: Стежка в галасливе місто.
  EN TP: a fantasy forest path
  ua TP: лісова стежка у світі фантазії
  EN FP: a fantasy book cover
  ua FP: обкладинка фентезі-книжки
2404 | lotus (noun): a large white water flower with many petals | loc: лотос
  EN TS: This lotus has an orange centre.
  ua TS: У цього лотоса помаранчева серцевина.
  EN FS: This lotus has a purple centre.
  ua FS: У цього лотоса фіолетова серцевина.
  EN TP: a white lotus flower
  ua TP: біла квітка лотоса
  EN FP: a lotus yoga pose
  ua FP: поза лотоса в йозі
2406 | jeep (noun): a strong car for driving on rough roads | loc: джип
  EN TS: One jeep, too many bags!
  ua TS: Один джип, забагато сумок!
  EN FS: One bike, too many bags!
  ua FS: Один велосипед, забагато сумок!
  EN TP: a jeep full of bags
  ua TP: джип, повний сумок
  EN FP: a jeep in the city
  ua FP: джип у місті
2408 | imagination (noun): the mind's power to create unreal worlds | loc: уява
  EN TS: Imagination opens a real path.
  ua TS: Уява відкриває справжню стежку.
  EN FS: Imagination opens a real door.
  ua FS: Уява відкриває справжні двері.
  EN TP: a book of imagination
  ua TP: книга уяви
  EN FP: no imagination at all
  ua FP: жодної уяви
2411 | ornate (adjective): covered in rich, detailed patterns | loc: оздоблений
  EN TS: That crown is so ornate!
  ua TS: Ця корона така оздоблена!
  EN FS: That mask is so ornate!
  ua FS: Ця маска така оздоблена!
  EN TP: an ornate golden crown
  ua TP: оздоблена золота корона
  EN FP: an ornate wooden door
  ua FP: оздоблені дерев'яні двері
2412 | arm in arm (phrase): walking with your arm linked through another's | loc: під руку
  EN TS: They are walking arm in arm.
  ua TS: Вони йдуть під руку.
  EN FS: They are running arm in arm.
  ua FS: Вони біжать під руку.
  EN TP: walking arm in arm
  ua TP: ідуть під руку
  EN FP: sitting arm in arm
  ua FP: сидять під руку
2413 | cub (noun): the baby of a wild animal like a wolf | loc: дитинча
  EN TS: She is hugging a wolf cub!
  ua TS: Вона обіймає дитинча вовка!
  EN FS: She is hugging a bear cub!
  ua FS: Вона обіймає дитинча ведмедя!
  EN TP: hugging a wolf cub
  ua TP: обіймає дитинча вовка
  EN FP: hugging a big wolf
  ua FP: обіймає великого вовка
2415 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: гірлянда
  EN TS: The god wears flower garlands.
  ua TS: Бог у гірляндах із квітів.
  EN FS: The god wears paper garlands.
  ua FS: Бог у гірляндах із паперу.
  EN TP: garlands of red flowers
  ua TP: гірлянди з червоних квітів
  EN FP: garlands on a Christmas tree
  ua FP: гірлянди на ялинці
2417 | harmony (noun): a state where opposites fit together calmly | loc: гармонія
  EN TS: Dark and light in harmony.
  ua TS: Темне і світле в гармонії.
  EN FS: Red and blue in harmony.
  ua FS: Червоне і синє в гармонії.
  EN TP: a sphere of harmony
  ua TP: сфера гармонії
  EN FP: singing in harmony
  ua FP: гармонія в хорі
2418 | songbird (noun): a small bird known for its singing | loc: співочий птах
  EN TS: I think it's a songbird.
  ua TS: Здається, це співочий птах.
  EN FS: I think it's a pigeon.
  ua FS: Здається, це голуб.
  EN TP: a songbird on a branch
  ua TP: співочий птах на гілці
  EN FP: a songbird on a roof
  ua FP: співочий птах на даху
2420 | rickety (adjective): old, weak and likely to fall apart | loc: хиткий
  EN TS: This rickety tower is "safe".
  ua TS: Ця хитка вежа — «безпечна».
  EN FS: This rickety bridge is "safe".
  ua FS: Цей хиткий міст — «безпечний».
  EN TP: a rickety tower of houses
  ua TP: хитка вежа з будинків
  EN FP: a rickety old chair
  ua FP: хиткий старий стілець
2421 | fungus (noun): a mushroom-like thing that grows in damp places | loc: гриб
  EN TS: This fungus is big. Really big.
  ua TS: Цей гриб великий. Дуже великий.
  EN FS: This fungus is small. Really small.
  ua FS: Цей гриб малий. Дуже малий.
  EN TP: giant pale fungus
  ua TP: велетенський блідий гриб
  EN FP: fungus on old bread
  ua FP: пліснява на старому хлібі
2422 | overalls (noun): trousers with straps over the shoulders | loc: комбінезон
  EN TS: She is reading in overalls.
  ua TS: Вона читає в комбінезоні.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in overalls.
  ua FS: Вона спить у комбінезоні.
  EN TP: blue denim overalls
  ua TP: синій джинсовий комбінезон
  EN FP: overalls covered in paint
  ua FP: комбінезон у фарбі
2424 | cypress (noun): a tall narrow dark-green tree | loc: кипарис
  EN TS: Cypresses grow on the left.
  ua TS: Кипариси ростуть ліворуч.
  EN FS: Cypresses grow on the right.
  ua FS: Кипариси ростуть праворуч.
  EN TP: a row of cypress trees
  ua TP: ряд кипарисів
  EN FP: a cypress in a pot
  ua FP: кипарис у горщику
2425 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: рамка
  EN TS: A black cat in a spooky frame!
  ua TS: Чорний кіт у моторошній рамці!
  EN FS: A white cat in a spooky frame!
  ua FS: Білий кіт у моторошній рамці!
  EN TP: a frame with black roses
  ua TP: рамка з чорними трояндами
  EN FP: a frame for a bicycle
  ua FP: рама велосипеда
2428 | monitor (noun): the screen you look at on a computer | loc: монітор
  EN TS: Three monitors, maximum focus.
  ua TS: Три монітори, максимальний фокус.
  EN FS: Two monitors, maximum focus.
  ua FS: Два монітори, максимальний фокус.
  EN TP: three large monitors
  ua TP: три великі монітори
  EN FP: a baby monitor
  ua FP: радіоняня
2429 | stag (noun): an adult male deer with large antlers | loc: олень
  EN TS: Yo, the stag is in a stream.
  ua TS: Йо, олень стоїть у струмку.
  EN FS: Yo, the stag is in a field.
  ua FS: Йо, олень стоїть у полі.
  EN TP: a stag in a stream
  ua TP: олень у струмку
  EN FP: a stag in the snow
  ua FP: олень у снігу
2430 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: текти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The river flows past rocks.
  ua TS: Річка тече повз скелі.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  ua FS: Річка тече повз будинки.
  EN TP: a river flowing through rocks
  ua TP: річка тече між скелями
  EN FP: a river flowing through town
  ua FP: річка тече через місто
2432 | flamenco (noun): a fiery Spanish dance with fans and stamping | loc: фламенко
  EN TS: Her flamenco pose is fire!
  ua TS: Її поза фламенко — вогонь!
  EN FS: Her ballet pose is fire!
  ua FS: Її балетна поза — вогонь!
  EN TP: flamenco with a fan
  ua TP: фламенко з віялом
  EN FP: flamenco on a stage
  ua FP: фламенко на сцені
2433 | gallop (verb): how a horse runs at its fastest speed | loc: мчати галопом
  EN TS: The horse is galloping at us!
  ua TS: Кінь мчить галопом прямо на нас!
  EN FS: The donkey is galloping at us!
  ua FS: Віслюк мчить галопом прямо на нас!
  EN TP: a galloping white horse
  ua TP: білий кінь мчить галопом
  EN FP: a galloping black horse
  ua FP: чорний кінь мчить галопом
2434 | still life (noun): a painting of arranged objects like flowers | loc: натюрморт
  EN TS: The still life shows blossoms.
  ua TS: На натюрморті — квітучі гілки.
  EN FS: The still life shows oranges.
  ua FS: На натюрморті — апельсини.
  EN TP: a still life with blossoms
  ua TP: натюрморт із квітучими гілками
  EN FP: a still life with fruit
  ua FP: натюрморт із фруктами
2435 | pebble (noun): a small smooth round stone | loc: камінець
  EN TS: The stream is full of pebbles.
  ua TS: Струмок повний камінців.
  EN FS: The stream is full of fish.
  ua FS: Струмок повний риби.
  EN TP: smooth round pebbles
  ua TP: гладенькі круглі камінці
  EN FP: pebbles on a beach
  ua FP: камінці на пляжі
2439 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: мокрий
  EN TS: The street is wet at night.
  ua TS: Уночі вулиця мокра.
  EN FS: The street is dry at night.
  ua FS: Уночі вулиця суха.
  EN TP: a wet night street
  ua TP: мокра нічна вулиця
  EN FP: a wet sandy beach
  ua FP: мокрий піщаний пляж
2440 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: електрика
  EN TS: The electricity is everywhere!
  ua TS: Електрика всюди!
  EN FS: The water is everywhere!
  ua FS: Вода всюди!
  EN TP: sparks of electricity
  ua TP: іскри електрики
  EN FP: an electricity bill
  ua FP: рахунок за електрику
2446 | shoelaces (noun): strings that tie your shoes or boots closed | loc: шнурки
  EN TS: Big bows, long shoelaces!
  ua TS: Великі банти, довгі шнурки!
  EN FS: Big bows, short shoelaces!
  ua FS: Великі банти, короткі шнурки!
  EN TP: long yellow shoelaces
  ua TP: довгі жовті шнурки
  EN FP: broken yellow shoelaces
  ua FP: порвані жовті шнурки
2449 | shop window (noun): a big glass front where a store shows its goods | loc: вітрина
  EN TS: Just a "few" glowing shop windows.
  ua TS: Лише «кілька» сяючих вітрин.
  EN FS: Just a "few" dark shop windows.
  ua FS: Лише «кілька» темних вітрин.
  EN TP: glowing shop windows
  ua TP: сяючі вітрини
  EN FP: a broken shop window
  ua FP: розбита вітрина
2450 | thunderstorm (noun): a storm with lightning and loud rumbling | loc: гроза
  EN TS: A thunderstorm over the water.
  ua TS: Гроза над водою.
  EN FS: A thunderstorm over the city.
  ua FS: Гроза над містом.
  EN TP: a thunderstorm over water
  ua TP: гроза над водою
  EN FP: a thunderstorm over a town
  ua FP: гроза над містечком
2451 | eiffel tower (noun): the famous tall iron landmark in Paris | loc: Ейфелева вежа
  EN TS: A bird near the Eiffel Tower.
  ua TS: Птах біля Ейфелевої вежі.
  EN FS: A plane near the Eiffel Tower.
  ua FS: Літак біля Ейфелевої вежі.
  EN TP: the riverside Eiffel Tower
  ua TP: Ейфелева вежа над річкою
  EN FP: the Eiffel Tower in snow
  ua FP: Ейфелева вежа в снігу
2452 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: романтичний
  EN TS: The snowy walk is romantic!
  ua TS: Снігова прогулянка — це так романтично!
  EN FS: The rainy walk is romantic!
  ua FS: Дощова прогулянка — це так романтично!
  EN TP: a romantic snowy walk
  ua TP: романтична прогулянка снігом
  EN FP: a romantic candle dinner
  ua FP: романтична вечеря при свічках
2454 | winding (adjective): curving and turning again and again | loc: звивистий
  EN TS: The winding path has lanterns.
  ua TS: На звивистій стежці — ліхтарі.
  EN FS: The straight path has lamps.
  ua FS: На прямій стежці — лампи.
  EN TP: a winding cobblestone path
  ua TP: звивиста брукована стежка
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  ua FP: звивиста гірська річка
2455 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: шорти
  EN TS: She wears green shorts.
  ua TS: Вона в зелених шортах.
  EN FS: She wears green trousers.
  ua FS: Вона в зелених штанах.
  EN TP: green denim shorts
  ua TP: зелені джинсові шорти
  EN FP: green swimming shorts
  ua FP: зелені шорти для плавання
2457 | nurse (noun): a person who cares for sick people in a hospital | loc: медсестра
  EN TS: The nurse has a stethoscope.
  ua TS: У медсестри стетоскоп.
  EN FS: The nurse has a clipboard.
  ua FS: У медсестри планшет із паперами.
  EN TP: a nurse in uniform
  ua TP: медсестра у формі
  EN FP: a nurse with a baby
  ua FP: медсестра з немовлям
2458 | farmhouse (noun): the main house on a farm, where the farmer lives | loc: фермерський будинок
  EN TS: A farmhouse with lit windows.
  ua TS: Фермерський будинок зі світлом у вікнах.
  EN FS: A farmhouse with dark windows.
  ua FS: Фермерський будинок із темними вікнами.
  EN TP: a farmhouse at sunset
  ua TP: фермерський будинок на заході сонця
  EN FP: a farmhouse by the sea
  ua FP: фермерський будинок біля моря
2460 | wildflowers (noun): flowers that grow by themselves in fields | loc: польові квіти
  EN TS: Wildflowers in a blue pot, cute.
  ua TS: Польові квіти в синьому горщику — мило.
  EN FS: Wildflowers in a red pot, cute.
  ua FS: Польові квіти в червоному горщику — мило.
  EN TP: a pot of wildflowers
  ua TP: горщик польових квітів
  EN FP: a field of wildflowers
  ua FP: луг із польовими квітами
2462 | starry (adjective): full of stars, said about a night sky | loc: зоряний
  EN TS: The starry sky has a moon.
  ua TS: На зоряному небі — місяць.
  EN FS: The starry sky has a rainbow.
  ua FS: На зоряному небі — веселка.
  EN TP: a starry night sky
  ua TP: зоряне нічне небо
  EN FP: a starry city night
  ua FP: зоряна ніч у місті
2463 | peony (noun): a big round flower with soft ruffled petals | loc: півонія
  EN TS: The valley features pink peonies.
  ua TS: У долині — рожеві півонії.
  EN FS: The valley features pink tulips.
  ua FS: У долині — рожеві тюльпани.
  EN TP: pink peonies on a hill
  ua TP: рожеві півонії на пагорбі
  EN FP: peonies in a vase
  ua FP: півонії у вазі
2464 | symmetrical (adjective): the same on both sides, like a mirror | loc: симетричний
  EN TS: The patterns are symmetrical.
  ua TS: Візерунки симетричні.
  EN FS: The patterns are colourful.
  ua FS: Візерунки барвисті.
  EN TP: symmetrical leaf patterns
  ua TP: симетричні візерунки листя
  EN FP: a symmetrical building
  ua FP: симетрична будівля
2465 | float (verb): to stay up in the air without falling | loc: ширяти
  EN TS: She is floating. No big deal.
  ua TS: Вона ширяє в повітрі. Нічого особливого.
  EN FS: She is swimming. No big deal.
  ua FS: Вона пливе. Нічого особливого.
  EN TP: floating in a blue sky
  ua TP: ширяє в блакитному небі
  EN FP: floating in a pool
  ua FP: плаває в басейні
2466 | crystal (noun): a clear hard stone with flat shiny faces | loc: кристал
  EN TS: Her dress is made of crystals.
  ua TS: Її сукня з кристалів.
  EN FS: Her dress is made of feathers.
  ua FS: Її сукня з пір'я.
  EN TP: a dress of glowing crystals
  ua TP: сукня із сяючих кристалів
  EN FP: a crystal glass of water
  ua FP: кришталевий келих води
2470 | saxophone (noun): a curved metal wind instrument used in jazz | loc: саксофон
  EN TS: The saxophone has a curved bell.
  ua TS: У саксофона вигнутий розтруб.
  EN FS: The saxophone has a straight bell.
  ua FS: У саксофона прямий розтруб.
  EN TP: a floating saxophone
  ua TP: саксофон у повітрі
  EN FP: a saxophone player
  ua FP: саксофоніст на сцені
2471 | bookworm (noun): a person who reads all the time | loc: книжковий черв'як
  EN TS: She is such a bookworm.
  ua TS: Вона справжній книжковий черв'як.
  EN FS: She is such a gamer.
  ua FS: Вона справжня геймерка.
  EN TP: a bookworm with a book
  ua TP: книжковий черв'як із книжкою
  EN FP: a bookworm with a phone
  ua FP: книжковий черв'як із телефоном
2472 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: форма
  EN TS: Her uniform looks really neat.
  ua TS: Її форма виглядає дуже охайно.
  EN FS: Her coat looks really neat.
  ua FS: Її пальто виглядає дуже охайно.
  EN TP: a school uniform
  ua TP: шкільна форма
  EN FP: a police uniform
  ua FP: поліцейська форма
2473 | wreath (noun): a ring of leaves hung up as decoration | loc: вінок
  EN TS: The wreath is on a red door.
  ua TS: Вінок висить на червоних дверях.
  EN FS: The wreath is on a blue door.
  ua FS: Вінок висить на синіх дверях.
  EN TP: a wreath on the door
  ua TP: вінок на дверях
  EN FP: a wreath on her head
  ua FP: вінок на її голові
2474 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: піна
  EN TS: Wild foam on a stormy sea.
  ua TS: Дика піна на штормовому морі.
  EN FS: Wild foam on a calm sea.
  ua FS: Дика піна на спокійному морі.
  EN TP: foam on stormy waves
  ua TP: піна на штормових хвилях
  EN FP: coffee with milk foam
  ua FP: кава з молочною піною
2475 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: босий
  EN TS: She is reading barefoot.
  ua TS: Вона читає боса.
  EN FS: She is dancing barefoot.
  ua FS: Вона танцює боса.
  EN TP: barefoot on a daybed
  ua TP: боса на кушетці
  EN FP: barefoot on the beach
  ua FP: боса на пляжі
2477 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: розкуйовджений
  EN TS: The wind made his hair messy.
  ua TS: Через вітер його волосся розкуйовджене.
  EN FS: The rain made his hair messy.
  ua FS: Через дощ його волосся розкуйовджене.
  EN TP: messy brown hair
  ua TP: розкуйовджене каштанове волосся
  EN FP: a messy bedroom
  ua FP: безлад у спальні
2478 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: лікар
  EN TS: The doctor is smiling at us.
  ua TS: Лікар усміхається нам.
  EN FS: The doctor is shouting at us.
  ua FS: Лікар кричить на нас.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon doctor
  ua TP: усміхнений мультяшний лікар
  EN FP: a doctor in surgery
  ua FP: лікар на операції
2480 | present (noun): a gift you give someone | loc: подарунок
  EN TS: The car has too many presents!
  ua TS: На машині забагато подарунків!
  EN FS: The car has too many dogs!
  ua FS: На машині забагато собак!
  EN TP: presents on a car roof
  ua TP: подарунки на даху машини
  EN FP: presents under a tree
  ua FP: подарунки під ялинкою
2481 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: глобус
  EN TS: He is holding a globe.
  ua TS: Він тримає глобус.
  EN FS: He is holding a ball.
  ua FS: Він тримає м'яч.
  EN TP: holding a globe
  ua TP: тримає глобус
  EN FP: a snow globe
  ua FP: сніжна куля
2482 | turret (noun): a small round tower on a big building | loc: вежка
  EN TS: So many turrets on one castle!
  ua TS: Стільки вежок на одному замку!
  EN FS: So many flags on one castle!
  ua FS: Стільки прапорів на одному замку!
  EN TP: pointed castle turrets
  ua TP: гострі вежки замку
  EN FP: a tank turret
  ua FP: башта танка
2483 | dried (adjective): with all the water taken out to keep it | loc: сушений
  EN TS: Dried flowers lie in the book.
  ua TS: У книжці лежать сушені квіти.
  EN FS: Fresh flowers lie in the book.
  ua FS: У книжці лежать свіжі квіти.
  EN TP: dried flowers in a book
  ua TP: сушені квіти в книжці
  EN FP: dried fruit in a bowl
  ua FP: сушені фрукти в мисці
2484 | steeple (noun): the tall pointed tower of a church | loc: дзвіниця
  EN TS: The church has a tall steeple.
  ua TS: У церкви висока дзвіниця.
  EN FS: The castle has a tall steeple.
  ua FS: У замку висока дзвіниця.
  EN TP: a church steeple in snow
  ua TP: церковна дзвіниця в снігу
  EN FP: a steeple in a city
  ua FP: дзвіниця в місті
2485 | sinister (adjective): looking evil, as if something bad will happen | loc: зловісний
  EN TS: The crow man looks sinister.
  ua TS: Чоловік-ворон має зловісний вигляд.
  EN FS: The cat man looks sinister.
  ua FS: Чоловік-кіт має зловісний вигляд.
  EN TP: a sinister crow-headed figure
  ua TP: зловісна постать із головою ворона
  EN FP: a sinister black cat
  ua FP: зловісний чорний кіт
2486 | hieroglyphs (noun): the picture symbols of ancient Egyptian writing | loc: ієрогліфи
  EN TS: Hieroglyphs cover the wall.
  ua TS: Ієрогліфи вкривають стіну.
  EN FS: Flowers cover the wall.
  ua FS: Квіти вкривають стіну.
  EN TP: a wall of hieroglyphs
  ua TP: стіна з ієрогліфами
  EN FP: hieroglyphs in a textbook
  ua FP: ієрогліфи в підручнику
2490 | snowman (noun): a winter figure made of big white frozen balls | loc: сніговик
  EN TS: Nice hat! Is the snowman cold?
  ua TS: Класний капелюх! Сніговику не холодно?
  EN FS: Nice hat! Is the dog cold?
  ua FS: Класний капелюх! Песику не холодно?
  EN TP: a snowman in a hat
  ua TP: сніговик у капелюсі
  EN FP: building a snowman
  ua FP: ліплять сніговика
2492 | busy (adjective): full of people and activity | loc: жвавий
  EN TS: The village is so busy!
  ua TS: Село таке жваве!
  EN FS: The village is so quiet!
  ua FS: Село таке тихе!
  EN TP: a busy snowy village
  ua TP: жваве засніжене село
  EN FP: a busy summer beach
  ua FP: жвавий літній пляж
2493 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: клаптева ковдра
  EN TS: The farm is sewn as a quilt.
  ua TS: Ферму зшито як клаптеву ковдру.
  EN FS: The farm is sewn as a flag.
  ua FS: Ферму зшито як прапор.
  EN TP: a quilt of a farm
  ua TP: клаптева ковдра з фермою
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  ua FP: клаптева ковдра на ліжку
2494 | victorian (adjective): in the style of 19th-century England | loc: вікторіанський
  EN TS: Victorian street. Is that Sherlock?
  ua TS: Вікторіанська вулиця. Це Шерлок?
  EN FS: Modern street. Is that Sherlock?
  ua FS: Сучасна вулиця. Це Шерлок?
  EN TP: a snowy Victorian street
  ua TP: засніжена вікторіанська вулиця
  EN FP: a Victorian tea party
  ua FP: вікторіанське чаювання
2495 | sparrow (noun): a small brown bird you see everywhere | loc: горобець
  EN TS: I counted two sparrows.
  ua TS: Я нарахував двох горобців.
  EN FS: I counted four sparrows.
  ua FS: Я нарахував чотирьох горобців.
  EN TP: two sparrows on a branch
  ua TP: два горобці на гілці
  EN FP: two sparrows in the snow
  ua FP: два горобці в снігу
2497 | santa claus (noun): the jolly man in red who brings Christmas presents | loc: Санта-Клаус
  EN TS: Santa Claus is taking a break.
  ua TS: Санта-Клаус бере перерву.
  EN FS: Santa Claus is taking a bath.
  ua FS: Санта-Клаус приймає ванну.
  EN TP: Santa Claus with presents
  ua TP: Санта-Клаус із подарунками
  EN FP: Santa Claus with reindeer
  ua FP: Санта-Клаус з оленями
2498 | tender (adjective): gentle and full of love | loc: ніжний
  EN TS: They share a tender hug.
  ua TS: У них ніжні обійми.
  EN FS: They share a tender kiss.
  ua FS: У них ніжний поцілунок.
  EN TP: a tender embrace
  ua TP: ніжні обійми
  EN FP: a tender steak
  ua FP: ніжний стейк
2499 | teddy bear (noun): a soft cuddly toy animal for children | loc: плюшевий ведмедик
  EN TS: Two teddy bears are cuddling.
  ua TS: Двоє плюшевих ведмедиків обіймаються.
  EN FS: Two teddy bears are fighting.
  ua FS: Двоє плюшевих ведмедиків б'ються.
  EN TP: teddy bears in the snow
  ua TP: плюшеві ведмедики в снігу
  EN FP: teddy bears on a bed
  ua FP: плюшеві ведмедики на ліжку
2500 | laptop (noun): a small computer you can carry and fold shut | loc: ноутбук
  EN TS: He is typing on a laptop.
  ua TS: Він друкує на ноутбуці.
  EN FS: He is typing on a phone.
  ua FS: Він друкує на телефоні.
  EN TP: typing on a laptop
  ua TP: друкує на ноутбуці
  EN FP: carrying a laptop
  ua FP: несе ноутбук
2501 | shiva (noun): the Hindu god with blue skin and a trident | loc: Шива
  EN TS: Shiva is meditating on a rock.
  ua TS: Шива медитує на скелі.
  EN FS: Shiva is meditating in a boat.
  ua FS: Шива медитує в човні.
  EN TP: Shiva with a trident
  ua TP: Шива з тризубом
  EN FP: Shiva with a sword
  ua FP: Шива з мечем
2502 | shrine (noun): a small holy place built to honour someone | loc: святиня
  EN TS: A forest shrine full of moss.
  ua TS: Лісова святиня, вся в моху.
  EN FS: A desert shrine full of sand.
  ua FS: Пустельна святиня, вся в піску.
  EN TP: a mossy forest shrine
  ua TP: замшіла лісова святиня
  EN FP: a shrine in a city
  ua FP: святиня в місті
2504 | krishna (noun): a Hindu god shown with blue skin | loc: Крішна
  EN TS: Krishna has a peacock feather.
  ua TS: У Крішни павине перо.
  EN FS: Krishna has an eagle feather.
  ua FS: У Крішни орлине перо.
  EN TP: Krishna with a crown
  ua TP: Крішна в короні
  EN FP: Krishna with a flute
  ua FP: Крішна з флейтою
2505 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: гвинтівка
  EN TS: Rain, a rifle and zero complaints.
  ua TS: Дощ, гвинтівка і нуль скарг.
  EN FS: Sun, a rifle and zero complaints.
  ua FS: Сонце, гвинтівка і нуль скарг.
  EN TP: a long scoped rifle
  ua TP: довга гвинтівка з прицілом
  EN FP: a rifle on the ground
  ua FP: гвинтівка на землі
2506 | geometric (adjective): made of simple regular shapes like squares | loc: геометричний
  EN TS: Everything here is geometric.
  ua TS: Тут усе геометричне.
  EN FS: Everything here is blue.
  ua FS: Тут усе синє.
  EN TP: pink geometric shapes
  ua TP: рожеві геометричні фігури
  EN FP: a geometric maths test
  ua FP: контрольна з геометрії
2509 | lavender (noun): a purple plant with a famous sweet smell | loc: лаванда
  EN TS: A path runs through lavender.
  ua TS: Стежка біжить крізь лаванду.
  EN FS: A path runs through wheat.
  ua FS: Стежка біжить крізь пшеницю.
  EN TP: rows of purple lavender
  ua TP: ряди фіолетової лаванди
  EN FP: a bottle of lavender oil
  ua FP: пляшечка лавандової олії
2510 | bedtime (noun): the time when you go to sleep | loc: час сну
  EN TS: Bedtime for a boy and a cat!
  ua TS: Час сну для хлопчика й кота!
  EN FS: Bedtime for a boy and a dog!
  ua FS: Час сну для хлопчика й собаки!
  EN TP: bedtime under a blanket
  ua TP: час сну під ковдрою
  EN FP: bedtime story with a book
  ua FP: казка на ніч із книжкою
2511 | spark (noun): a tiny glowing bit of fire in the air | loc: іскра
  EN TS: Sparks are flying around them.
  ua TS: Навколо них літають іскри.
  EN FS: Leaves are flying around them.
  ua FS: Навколо них літає листя.
  EN TP: sparks around a couple
  ua TP: іскри навколо пари
  EN FP: a spark from a plug
  ua FP: іскра з розетки
2512 | coloring book (noun): a set of outline pictures for kids to paint in | loc: розмальовка
  EN TS: This coloring book needs you.
  ua TS: Ця розмальовка чекає на тебе.
  EN FS: This photo book needs you.
  ua FS: Цей фотоальбом чекає на тебе.
  EN TP: a coloring book page
  ua TP: сторінка розмальовки
  EN FP: a coloring book cover
  ua FP: обкладинка розмальовки
2514 | herbs (noun): leafy plants used in cooking, tea or medicine | loc: трави
  EN TS: She's adding herbs to a bowl.
  ua TS: Вона додає трави в миску.
  EN FS: She's adding salt to a bowl.
  ua FS: Вона додає сіль у миску.
  EN TP: sprinkling dried herbs
  ua TP: посипає сушеними травами
  EN FP: chopping fresh herbs
  ua FP: нарізає свіжі трави
2516 | year (noun): a period of twelve months | loc: рік
  EN TS: The year is 2024.
  ua TS: Зараз 2024 рік.
  EN FS: The year is 2025.
  ua FS: Зараз 2025 рік.
  EN TP: the year 2024 glowing
  ua TP: сяючий 2024 рік
  EN FP: the year 2025
  ua FP: 2025 рік
2519 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: заднє подвір'я
  EN TS: Did you see this backyard? A flamingo!
  ua TS: Бачили це заднє подвір'я? Фламінго!
  EN FS: Did you see this backyard? A swing!
  ua FS: Бачили це заднє подвір'я? Гойдалка!
  EN TP: a busy little backyard
  ua TP: жваве маленьке заднє подвір'я
  EN FP: a backyard vegetable patch
  ua FP: город на задньому подвір'ї
2520 | sacred (adjective): holy and connected to religion | loc: священний
  EN TS: A sacred light from above!
  ua TS: Священне світло згори!
  EN FS: A sacred light from below!
  ua FS: Священне світло знизу!
  EN TP: a sacred beam of light
  ua TP: священний промінь світла
  EN FP: a sacred river
  ua FP: священна річка
2522 | clover (noun): a small plant with round leaves, a lucky sign | loc: конюшина
  EN TS: The clovers have four leaves.
  ua TS: У конюшини чотири листки.
  EN FS: The clovers have three leaves.
  ua FS: У конюшини три листки.
  EN TP: four-leaf clovers
  ua TP: чотирилиста конюшина
  EN FP: a clover field with cows
  ua FP: поле конюшини з коровами
2523 | snowfall (noun): snow coming down from the sky | loc: снігопад
  EN TS: The snowfall is heavy tonight.
  ua TS: Сьогодні сильний снігопад.
  EN FS: The rainfall is heavy tonight.
  ua FS: Сьогодні сильна злива.
  EN TP: heavy snowfall over a village
  ua TP: сильний снігопад над селом
  EN FP: light snowfall in a city
  ua FP: легкий снігопад у місті
2524 | walking stick (noun): a stick you lean on to help you walk | loc: ціпок
  EN TS: He has a walking stick.
  ua TS: У нього ціпок.
  EN FS: He has a big umbrella.
  ua FS: У нього велика парасоля.
  EN TP: leaning on a walking stick
  ua TP: спирається на ціпок
  EN FP: a walking stick for hiking
  ua FP: ціпок для походів
2525 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: піднімати
  EN TS: Mum is lifting her baby bear.
  ua TS: Мама піднімає своє ведмежа.
  EN FS: Mum is lifting her baby fox.
  ua FS: Мама піднімає своє лисеня.
  EN TP: to lift the cub up
  ua TP: піднімати дитинча
  EN FP: to lift a heavy box
  ua FP: піднімати важку коробку
2526 | poseidon (noun): the ancient Greek god of the sea | loc: Посейдон
  EN TS: Poseidon has two spears.
  ua TS: У Посейдона два списи.
  EN FS: Poseidon has two swords.
  ua FS: У Посейдона два мечі.
  EN TP: Poseidon rising from waves
  ua TP: Посейдон піднімається з хвиль
  EN FP: Poseidon sinking a ship
  ua FP: Посейдон топить корабель
2527 | gas mask (noun): a mask that protects your face from dangerous air | loc: протигаз
  EN TS: The DJ wears a gas mask. Why?
  ua TS: Діджей у протигазі. Навіщо?
  EN FS: The DJ wears a ski mask. Why?
  ua FS: Діджей у балаклаві. Навіщо?
  EN TP: gas mask and headphones
  ua TP: протигаз і навушники
  EN FP: gas mask and goggles
  ua FP: протигаз і захисні окуляри
2528 | top hat (noun): a tall formal hat with a flat top | loc: циліндр
  EN TS: A purple top hat? Bold choice.
  ua TS: Фіолетовий циліндр? Сміливий вибір.
  EN FS: A black top hat? Bold choice.
  ua FS: Чорний циліндр? Сміливий вибір.
  EN TP: a shiny purple top hat
  ua TP: блискучий фіолетовий циліндр
  EN FP: a magician's top hat
  ua FP: циліндр фокусника
2529 | gentle (adjective): kind, calm and soft in the way you act | loc: лагідний
  EN TS: He has a gentle face.
  ua TS: У нього лагідне обличчя.
  EN FS: He has a gentle dog.
  ua FS: У нього лагідний пес.
  EN TP: a gentle calm face
  ua TP: лагідне спокійне обличчя
  EN FP: a gentle calm sea
  ua FP: лагідне спокійне море
2530 | candlelight (noun): the warm light of a burning candle | loc: світло свічки
  EN TS: Candlelight glows among roses.
  ua TS: Світло свічки мерехтить серед троянд.
  EN FS: Candlelight glows among books.
  ua FS: Світло свічки мерехтить серед книжок.
  EN TP: candlelight in a lantern
  ua TP: світло свічки в ліхтарі
  EN FP: candlelight on a cake
  ua FP: світло свічки на торті
2531 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: виблискувати
  EN TS: Even the sky sparkles for them.
  ua TS: Навіть небо виблискує для них.
  EN FS: Even the sea sparkles for them.
  ua FS: Навіть море виблискує для них.
  EN TP: a sparkling night sky
  ua TP: нічне небо виблискує
  EN FP: sparkling water in a glass
  ua FP: вода виблискує в склянці
2532 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: оборка
  EN TS: Her dress has grey ruffles.
  ua TS: На її сукні сірі оборки.
  EN FS: Her dress has red ruffles.
  ua FS: На її сукні червоні оборки.
  EN TP: a dress with grey ruffles
  ua TP: сукня із сірими оборками
  EN FP: ruffles on a red hat
  ua FP: оборки на червоному капелюсі
2533 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: туманний
  EN TS: The far end is misty.
  ua TS: Далекий кінець туманний.
  EN FS: The far end is sunny.
  ua FS: Далекий кінець сонячний.
  EN TP: a misty old street
  ua TP: туманна стара вулиця
  EN FP: a misty mountain lake
  ua FP: туманне гірське озеро
2536 | chimpanzee (noun): a large clever African ape with dark hair | loc: шимпанзе
  EN TS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious biker.
  ua TS: Цей шимпанзе схожий на серйозного байкера.
  EN FS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious surfer.
  ua FS: Цей шимпанзе схожий на серйозного серфера.
  EN TP: a chimpanzee on a motorbike
  ua TP: шимпанзе на мотоциклі
  EN FP: a chimpanzee in a tree
  ua FP: шимпанзе на дереві
2537 | bedtime story (noun): a story read to children before sleep | loc: казка на ніч
  EN TS: The girl is reading a bedtime story.
  ua TS: Дівчинка читає казку на ніч.
  EN FS: The boy is reading a bedtime story.
  ua FS: Хлопчик читає казку на ніч.
  EN TP: a bedtime story in bed
  ua TP: казка на ніч у ліжку
  EN FP: a bedtime story on TV
  ua FP: казка на ніч по телевізору
2538 | little red riding hood (noun): the fairy-tale girl in a red hooded cloak | loc: Червона Шапочка
  EN TS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the wolf.
  ua TS: Червона Шапочка довіряє вовкові.
  EN FS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the bear.
  ua FS: Червона Шапочка довіряє ведмедеві.
  EN TP: Little Red Riding Hood's wolf
  ua TP: вовк Червоної Шапочки
  EN FP: Little Red Riding Hood's gran
  ua FP: бабуся Червоної Шапочки
2539 | artificial intelligence (noun): computer systems that think and learn | loc: штучний інтелект
  EN TS: Artificial intelligence lives in her head.
  ua TS: Штучний інтелект живе в її голові.
  EN FS: Artificial intelligence lives in her car.
  ua FS: Штучний інтелект живе в її машині.
  EN TP: artificial intelligence robot
  ua TP: робот зі штучним інтелектом
  EN FP: artificial intelligence app
  ua FP: застосунок зі штучним інтелектом
2540 | dungeon (noun): a dark prison under a castle | loc: підземелля
  EN TS: What a "cosy" dungeon.
  ua TS: Яке «затишне» підземелля.
  EN FS: What a "cosy" garden.
  ua FS: Який «затишний» сад.
  EN TP: a dark dungeon with candles
  ua TP: темне підземелля зі свічками
  EN FP: a dark cellar with wine
  ua FP: темний погріб із вином
2541 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: сходи
  EN TS: Nobody cleaned this staircase.
  ua TS: Ці сходи ніхто не прибирав.
  EN FS: Nobody cleaned this kitchen.
  ua FS: Цю кухню ніхто не прибирав.
  EN TP: a crumbling stone staircase
  ua TP: напівзруйновані кам'яні сходи
  EN FP: a crumbling stone bridge
  ua FP: напівзруйнований кам'яний міст
2543 | tusk (noun): one of the two long teeth of an elephant | loc: бивень | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The elephant has long tusks.
  ua TS: У слона довгі бивні.
  EN FS: The elephant has short tusks.
  ua FS: У слона короткі бивні.
  EN TP: two long white tusks
  ua TP: два довгі білі бивні
  EN FP: a walrus with tusks
  ua FP: морж із бивнями
2544 | hanuman (noun): the Hindu monkey god with a crown and mace | loc: Хануман
  EN TS: Hanuman has a golden crown.
  ua TS: У Ханумана золота корона.
  EN FS: Hanuman has a silver crown.
  ua FS: У Ханумана срібна корона.
  EN TP: Hanuman with a golden staff
  ua TP: Хануман із золотим посохом
  EN FP: Hanuman with a sword
  ua FP: Хануман із мечем
2545 | worship (verb): to show deep love and respect to a god | loc: поклонятися
  EN TS: The monkey is worshipping.
  ua TS: Мавпа поклоняється.
  EN FS: The monkey is sleeping.
  ua FS: Мавпа спить.
  EN TP: worshipping on stone steps
  ua TP: поклоняється на кам'яних сходах
  EN FP: worshipping a football star
  ua FP: поклоняється футбольній зірці
2546 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: просторий
  EN TS: This hall is "quite" spacious.
  ua TS: Ця зала «доволі» простора.
  EN FS: This hall is "quite" tiny.
  ua FS: Ця зала «доволі» крихітна.
  EN TP: a spacious hall
  ua TP: простора зала
  EN FP: a spacious car
  ua FP: просторе авто
2547 | toadstool (noun): a mushroom with a red cap and white spots | loc: мухомор
  EN TS: These toadstools are massive!
  ua TS: Ці мухомори величезні!
  EN FS: These toadstools are tiny!
  ua FS: Ці мухомори крихітні!
  EN TP: giant red toadstools
  ua TP: велетенські червоні мухомори
  EN FP: toadstools in a basket
  ua FP: мухомори в кошику
2548 | barrel (noun): a big round wooden container | loc: бочка
  EN TS: So many barrels. Beer, maybe?
  ua TS: Стільки бочок. Може, пиво?
  EN FS: So many bikes. Beer, maybe?
  ua FS: Стільки велосипедів. Може, пиво?
  EN TP: stacked wooden barrels
  ua TP: дерев'яні бочки стосом
  EN FP: a barrel of cold beer
  ua FP: бочка холодного пива
2549 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: батько
  EN TS: Father and son are cheering!
  ua TS: Батько й син радіють!
  EN FS: Father and son are crying!
  ua FS: Батько й син плачуть!
  EN TP: a father carrying his son
  ua TP: батько несе сина
  EN FP: a father carrying shopping
  ua FP: батько несе покупки
2550 | cross-legged (adverb): sitting with your legs bent and crossed | loc: схрестивши ноги
  EN TS: She sits cross-legged, barefoot.
  ua TS: Вона сидить, схрестивши ноги, боса.
  EN FS: She sits cross-legged in boots.
  ua FS: Вона сидить, схрестивши ноги, у чоботях.
  EN TP: sitting cross-legged
  ua TP: сидить, схрестивши ноги
  EN FP: standing cross-legged
  ua FP: стоїть, схрестивши ноги
2551 | miami (noun): the Florida beach city of neon and palms | loc: Маямі
  EN TS: Miami vibes: palms and neon.
  ua TS: Вайб Маямі: пальми й неон.
  EN FS: Miami vibes: snow and neon.
  ua FS: Вайб Маямі: сніг і неон.
  EN TP: a neon Miami street
  ua TP: неонова вулиця Маямі
  EN FP: a Miami beach at noon
  ua FP: пляж Маямі опівдні
2552 | virtual reality (noun): a computer world seen through special goggles | loc: віртуальна реальність
  EN TS: She is in virtual reality.
  ua TS: Вона у віртуальній реальності.
  EN FS: She is in a swimming pool.
  ua FS: Вона в басейні.
  EN TP: a virtual reality headset
  ua TP: шолом віртуальної реальності
  EN FP: virtual reality at school
  ua FP: віртуальна реальність у школі
2556 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: мозок
  EN TS: Fact: the brain is glowing.
  ua TS: Факт: мозок світиться.
  EN FS: Fact: the heart is glowing.
  ua FS: Факт: серце світиться.
  EN TP: a glowing brain
  ua TP: сяючий мозок
  EN FP: a brain in a jar
  ua FP: мозок у банці
2557 | sailboat (noun): a small boat pushed along by the wind | loc: вітрильник
  EN TS: Wait, the sailboat is glass?
  ua TS: Стоп, вітрильник скляний?
  EN FS: Wait, the sailboat is wood?
  ua FS: Стоп, вітрильник дерев'яний?
  EN TP: a glass sailboat
  ua TP: скляний вітрильник
  EN FP: a sailboat in a bottle
  ua FP: вітрильник у пляшці
2558 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: свобода
  EN TS: She is flying. Pure freedom!
  ua TS: Вона летить. Чиста свобода!
  EN FS: She is swimming. Pure freedom!
  ua FS: Вона пливе. Чиста свобода!
  EN TP: freedom above the sea
  ua TP: свобода над морем
  EN FP: freedom under the sea
  ua FP: свобода під водою
2559 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: монета
  EN TS: This tree grows coins!
  ua TS: На цьому дереві ростуть монети!
  EN FS: This tree grows apples!
  ua FS: На цьому дереві ростуть яблука!
  EN TP: coins falling from a tree
  ua TP: монети падають з дерева
  EN FP: coins in a piggy bank
  ua FP: монети в скарбничці
2560 | miracle (noun): an amazing event that cannot be explained | loc: диво
  EN TS: Walking on water? A miracle!
  ua TS: Ходити по воді? Це диво!
  EN FS: Walking on fire? A miracle!
  ua FS: Ходити по вогню? Це диво!
  EN TP: a miracle on the ocean
  ua TP: диво посеред океану
  EN FP: a miracle cure for colds
  ua FP: диво-ліки від застуди
2562 | detective (noun): a person whose job is to solve crimes | loc: детектив
  EN TS: Rainy night, lonely detective.
  ua TS: Дощова ніч, самотній детектив.
  EN FS: Sunny day, lonely detective.
  ua FS: Сонячний день, самотній детектив.
  EN TP: a detective in the rain
  ua TP: детектив під дощем
  EN FP: a crime scene detective
  ua FP: детектив на місці злочину
2563 | merchant (noun): a person who buys and sells goods | loc: купець
  EN TS: A merchant is checking grain.
  ua TS: Купець перевіряє зерно.
  EN FS: A merchant is checking coins.
  ua FS: Купець перевіряє монети.
  EN TP: a merchant by candlelight
  ua TP: купець при свічці
  EN FP: a merchant at the market
  ua FP: купець на ринку
2564 | hydrangea (noun): a garden plant with round clusters of flowers | loc: гортензія
  EN TS: This hydrangea cluster is blue.
  ua TS: Це суцвіття гортензії блакитне.
  EN FS: This hydrangea cluster is pink.
  ua FS: Це суцвіття гортензії рожеве.
  EN TP: a blue hydrangea cluster
  ua TP: блакитне суцвіття гортензії
  EN FP: a hydrangea in a vase
  ua FP: гортензія у вазі
2567 | saint (noun): a very holy person honoured in religion | loc: святий
  EN TS: The saint wears a white veil.
  ua TS: Свята в білому покривалі.
  EN FS: The saint wears a red veil.
  ua FS: Свята в червоному покривалі.
  EN TP: a saint with a halo
  ua TP: свята з німбом
  EN FP: a saint on a horse
  ua FP: святий на коні
2571 | grumpy (adjective): in a bad mood and easily annoyed | loc: буркотливий
  EN TS: The boy is grumpy. Again.
  ua TS: Хлопчик буркотливий. Знову.
  EN FS: The girl is grumpy. Again.
  ua FS: Дівчинка буркотлива. Знову.
  EN TP: a grumpy little boy
  ua TP: буркотливий хлопчик
  EN FP: a grumpy old man
  ua FP: буркотливий дідусь
2572 | triangle (noun): a flat shape with three straight sides | loc: трикутник
  EN TS: The triangles are glowing.
  ua TS: Трикутники світяться.
  EN FS: The circles are glowing.
  ua FS: Кола світяться.
  EN TP: glowing neon triangles
  ua TP: сяючі неонові трикутники
  EN FP: a triangle road sign
  ua FP: дорожній знак-трикутник
2575 | anonymous (adjective): with the name and face kept hidden | loc: анонімний
  EN TS: The DJ is totally anonymous.
  ua TS: Діджей повністю анонімний.
  EN FS: The chef is totally anonymous.
  ua FS: Кухар повністю анонімний.
  EN TP: an anonymous hooded DJ
  ua TP: анонімний діджей у каптурі
  EN FP: an anonymous letter
  ua FP: анонімний лист
2576 | heartbroken (adjective): extremely sad after losing someone you love | loc: убитий горем
  EN TS: He is heartbroken in Paris.
  ua TS: Він убитий горем у Парижі.
  EN FS: He is heartbroken in Rome.
  ua FS: Він убитий горем у Римі.
  EN TP: heartbroken in the rain
  ua TP: убитий горем під дощем
  EN FP: heartbroken in the snow
  ua FP: убитий горем у снігу
2578 | visor (noun): the clear front part of a helmet | loc: забрало
  EN TS: The visor is like a mirror.
  ua TS: Забрало — як дзеркало.
  EN FS: The visor is like a window.
  ua FS: Забрало — як вікно.
  EN TP: a mirrored helmet visor
  ua TP: дзеркальне забрало шолома
  EN FP: a cap with a visor
  ua FP: кепка з козирком
2579 | weird (adjective): strange and not normal | loc: дивний
  EN TS: Her glasses are super weird.
  ua TS: Її окуляри супердивні.
  EN FS: Her hat is super weird.
  ua FS: Її капелюх супердивний.
  EN TP: a weird retro machine
  ua TP: дивний ретроапарат
  EN FP: a weird old car
  ua FP: дивне старе авто
2580 | archer (noun): a person who shoots with a bow and arrow | loc: лучник
  EN TS: The archer is drawing his bow.
  ua TS: Лучник натягує лук.
  EN FS: The archer is drawing a sword.
  ua FS: Лучник витягає меч.
  EN TP: a statue of an archer
  ua TP: статуя лучника
  EN FP: a painting of an archer
  ua FP: картина з лучником
2581 | flute (noun): a long thin instrument you blow across | loc: флейта
  EN TS: He is playing a bamboo flute.
  ua TS: Він грає на бамбуковій флейті.
  EN FS: He is playing a bamboo drum.
  ua FS: Він грає на бамбуковому барабані.
  EN TP: playing a bamboo flute
  ua TP: гра на бамбуковій флейті
  EN FP: carving a bamboo flute
  ua FP: вирізання бамбукової флейти
2583 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: насолоджуватися
  EN TS: She is enjoying the vibes.
  ua TS: Вона насолоджується вайбом.
  EN FS: She is enjoying the pizza.
  ua FS: Вона насолоджується піцою.
  EN TP: enjoying the music
  ua TP: насолоджується музикою
  EN FP: enjoying the sun
  ua FP: насолоджується сонцем
2584 | baptism (noun): a religious ceremony using water | loc: хрещення
  EN TS: It's a baptism in a river.
  ua TS: Це хрещення в річці.
  EN FS: It's a baptism in a church.
  ua FS: Це хрещення в церкві.
  EN TP: a baptism in the river
  ua TP: хрещення в річці
  EN FP: a church baptism
  ua FP: хрещення в церкві
2586 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: дружба
  EN TS: Best friendship ever: a giant robot and a little girl.
  ua TS: Найкраща дружба: велетенський робот і маленька дівчинка.
  EN FS: Best friendship ever: a giant dog and a little girl.
  ua FS: Найкраща дружба: велетенський пес і маленька дівчинка.
  EN TP: an unlikely friendship
  ua TP: несподівана дружба
  EN FP: a friendship bracelet
  ua FP: браслет дружби
2594 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: вчитися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot is learning about itself.
  ua TS: Робот вчиться розуміти себе.
  EN FS: The robot is learning about cats.
  ua FS: Робот вчиться розуміти котів.
  EN TP: a robot learning to read
  ua TP: робот вчиться читати
  EN FP: a robot learning to fly
  ua FP: робот вчиться літати
2595 | grand piano (noun): a large piano with a big lid that opens up | loc: рояль
  EN TS: Someone left a grand piano outside.
  ua TS: Хтось залишив рояль надворі.
  EN FS: Someone left a grand piano inside.
  ua FS: Хтось залишив рояль у приміщенні.
  EN TP: a grand piano outside
  ua TP: рояль надворі
  EN FP: a grand piano inside
  ua FP: рояль у приміщенні
2600 | beetle (noun): an insect with a hard shiny back | loc: жук
  EN TS: Bro, two beetles are chilling.
  ua TS: Бро, двоє жуків чілять.
  EN FS: Bro, two snails are chilling.
  ua FS: Бро, двоє равликів чілять.
  EN TP: beetles crawling on leaves
  ua TP: жуки повзають по листю
  EN FP: beetles flying over flowers
  ua FP: жуки літають над квітами
2601 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: ставати на коліна
  EN TS: The man is kneeling in prayer.
  ua TS: Чоловік стає на коліна, щоб помолитися.
  EN FS: The man is sitting in prayer.
  ua FS: Чоловік сідає, щоб помолитися.
  EN TP: kneeling on stone ground
  ua TP: стоїть на колінах на камені
  EN FP: kneeling on a soft sofa
  ua FP: стоїть на колінах на дивані
2602 | ski (verb): to slide over snow on long narrow boards | loc: кататися на лижах
  EN TS: They are skiing down so fast.
  ua TS: Вони катаються на лижах — униз і дуже швидко.
  EN FS: They are skiing up so fast.
  ua FS: Вони катаються на лижах — угору і дуже швидко.
  EN TP: skiing down a steep slope
  ua TP: на лижах крутим схилом
  EN FP: skiing on a flat road
  ua FP: на лижах рівною дорогою
2603 | sheet music (noun): printed paper with the notes of a piece | loc: ноти
  EN TS: The sheet music is handwritten.
  ua TS: Ноти написані від руки.
  EN FS: The sheet music is printed out.
  ua FS: Ноти надруковані.
  EN TP: old handwritten sheet music
  ua TP: старі рукописні ноти
  EN FP: new printed sheet music
  ua FP: нові друковані ноти
2604 | lifeless (adjective): dead-looking, with no life or leaves | loc: неживий
  EN TS: A lifeless tree, a green moon.
  ua TS: Неживе дерево, зелений місяць.
  EN FS: A lifeless tree, a white moon.
  ua FS: Неживе дерево, білий місяць.
  EN TP: a lifeless tree on rocks
  ua TP: неживе дерево на скелях
  EN FP: a lifeless potted tree
  ua FP: неживе дерево в горщику
2605 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: колисати на руках
  EN TS: He is cradling a baby.
  ua TS: Він колише немовля на руках.
  EN FS: He is cradling a lamb.
  ua FS: Він колише ягня на руках.
  EN TP: to cradle a baby
  ua TP: колисати немовля
  EN FP: to cradle a phone
  ua FP: притискати телефон до вуха
2606 | clockwork (noun): machinery of gears and springs inside a clock | loc: годинниковий механізм
  EN TS: Her head is pure clockwork.
  ua TS: Її голова — суцільний годинниковий механізм.
  EN FS: Her head is pure glass.
  ua FS: Її голова — суцільне скло.
  EN TP: a head full of clockwork
  ua TP: голова з годинниковим механізмом
  EN FP: a clockwork toy mouse
  ua FP: заводна іграшкова мишка
2607 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: носити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The cats wear formal coats.
  ua TS: Коти носять ділові пальта.
  EN FS: The dogs wear formal coats.
  ua FS: Пси носять ділові пальта.
  EN TP: cats wearing long coats
  ua TP: коти носять довгі пальта
  EN FP: cats wearing collars
  ua FP: коти носять нашийники
2611 | buckle (noun): the metal fastener that closes a belt | loc: пряжка
  EN TS: His belt has a metal buckle.
  ua TS: На його ремені металева пряжка.
  EN FS: His bag has a metal buckle.
  ua FS: На його сумці металева пряжка.
  EN TP: a metal belt buckle
  ua TP: металева пряжка ременя
  EN FP: buckling a seatbelt
  ua FP: застібає пасок безпеки
2612 | bud (noun): a flower that has not opened yet | loc: бутон
  EN TS: Two buds have not opened yet.
  ua TS: Два бутони ще не розкрилися.
  EN FS: Two buds have opened already.
  ua FS: Два бутони вже розкрилися.
  EN TP: two closed red buds
  ua TP: два закриті червоні бутони
  EN FP: two open red buds
  ua FP: два розкриті червоні бутони
2614 | minaret (noun): the tall thin tower of a mosque | loc: мінарет
  EN TS: Two boys are near a minaret.
  ua TS: Двоє хлопців біля мінарету.
  EN FS: Two girls are near a minaret.
  ua FS: Дві дівчини біля мінарету.
  EN TP: walking toward a minaret
  ua TP: іде до мінарету
  EN FP: climbing up a minaret
  ua FP: піднімається на мінарет
2618 | handwriting (noun): words written by hand, not printed | loc: почерк
  EN TS: The handwriting is in cursive.
  ua TS: Тут почерк із з'єднаними літерами.
  EN FS: The handwriting is in print.
  ua FS: Тут почерк із друкованими літерами.
  EN TP: faded cursive handwriting
  ua TP: вицвілий каліграфічний почерк
  EN FP: neat printed handwriting
  ua FP: акуратний друкований почерк
2621 | mast (noun): the tall pole that stands up from a deck | loc: щогла
  EN TS: The mast has lots of rigging.
  ua TS: На щоглі купа такелажу.
  EN FS: The mast has lots of flags.
  ua FS: На щоглі купа прапорів.
  EN TP: a tall mast with rigging
  ua TP: висока щогла з такелажем
  EN FP: a mast with pirate flags
  ua FP: щогла з піратськими прапорами
2622 | statue of liberty (noun): a green statue of a woman holding a torch | loc: Статуя Свободи
  EN TS: A tiny Statue of Liberty!
  ua TS: Крихітна Статуя Свободи!
  EN FS: A tiny Eiffel Tower!
  ua FS: Крихітна Ейфелева вежа!
  EN TP: a mini Statue of Liberty
  ua TP: міні-Статуя Свободи
  EN FP: a Statue of Liberty costume
  ua FP: костюм Статуї Свободи
2623 | ivy (noun): a green plant that climbs walls and trees | loc: плющ
  EN TS: Ivy covers the bookshelf.
  ua TS: Плющ укриває книжкову полицю.
  EN FS: Snow covers the bookshelf.
  ua FS: Сніг укриває книжкову полицю.
  EN TP: a bookshelf covered in ivy
  ua TP: полиця, вкрита плющем
  EN FP: a castle covered in ivy
  ua FP: замок, вкритий плющем
2625 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: інженер
  EN TS: The engineer dreams of cranes.
  ua TS: Інженер мріє про крани.
  EN FS: The engineer dreams of horses.
  ua FS: Інженер мріє про коней.
  EN TP: an engineer's hard hat
  ua TP: каска інженера
  EN FP: an engineer at a computer
  ua FP: інженер за комп'ютером
2626 | bald (adjective): having no hair on the head | loc: лисий
  EN TS: A city lives in his bald head.
  ua TS: У його лисій голові живе місто.
  EN FS: A farm lives in his bald head.
  ua FS: У його лисій голові живе ферма.
  EN TP: a bald head in profile
  ua TP: лиса голова в профіль
  EN FP: a bald head with glasses
  ua FP: лиса голова в окулярах
2629 | pigtails (noun): hair tied in two bunches, one each side | loc: кіски
  EN TS: Her hair is in two pigtails.
  ua TS: Її волосся зібране у дві кіски.
  EN FS: Her hair is in two buns.
  ua FS: Її волосся зібране у два пучки.
  EN TP: two long braided pigtails
  ua TP: дві довгі заплетені кіски
  EN FP: two short curly pigtails
  ua FP: дві короткі кучеряві кіски
2631 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: лінза
  EN TS: Her goggles have round lenses.
  ua TS: В її окулярах круглі лінзи.
  EN FS: Her goggles have no lenses.
  ua FS: В її окулярах немає лінз.
  EN TP: round tinted lenses
  ua TP: круглі тоновані лінзи
  EN FP: a lens on a camera
  ua FP: лінза фотоапарата
2633 | beam (noun): a line of light shining from something | loc: промінь | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: That tree is a disco. Look at the beams!
  ua TS: Це дерево — дискотека. Глянь на промені!
  EN FS: That tree is a disco. Look at the birds!
  ua FS: Це дерево — дискотека. Глянь на птахів!
  EN TP: beams of coloured light
  ua TP: промені кольорового світла
  EN FP: wooden beams of a roof
  ua FP: дерев'яні балки даху
2634 | cork (noun): the round plug that closes a bottle neck | loc: корок
  EN TS: Every bottle has a cork.
  ua TS: У кожній пляшці корок.
  EN FS: Every bottle has a straw.
  ua FS: У кожній пляшці соломинка.
  EN TP: bottles closed with corks
  ua TP: пляшки, закриті корками
  EN FP: a cork board with notes
  ua FP: коркова дошка з записками
2635 | magnolia (noun): a big cup-shaped flower that grows on a tree | loc: магнолія
  EN TS: The magnolia is creamy white.
  ua TS: Магнолія кремово-біла.
  EN FS: The magnolia is bright yellow.
  ua FS: Магнолія яскраво-жовта.
  EN TP: an open magnolia flower
  ua TP: розкрита квітка магнолії
  EN FP: a magnolia tree
  ua FP: дерево магнолії
2641 | ray (noun): a narrow line of light from a bright source | loc: промінь | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Rays are filling the sky!
  ua TS: Промені заповнюють небо!
  EN FS: Rays are filling the room!
  ua FS: Промені заповнюють кімнату!
  EN TP: golden rays of light
  ua TP: золоті промені світла
  EN FP: rays through a window
  ua FP: промені крізь вікно
2648 | ant (noun): a tiny insect that lives in large groups | loc: мураха
  EN TS: This ant is bigger than me!
  ua TS: Ця мураха більша за мене!
  EN FS: This bee is bigger than me!
  ua FS: Ця бджола більша за мене!
  EN TP: a huge black ant
  ua TP: величезна чорна мураха
  EN FP: a huge ant hill
  ua FP: величезний мурашник
2649 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: захисні окуляри
  EN TS: Those goggles are massive!
  ua TS: Ці захисні окуляри величезні!
  EN FS: Those earrings are massive!
  ua FS: Ці сережки величезні!
  EN TP: glowing goggles on her eyes
  ua TP: сяючі захисні окуляри
  EN FP: goggles for swimming
  ua FP: окуляри для плавання
2651 | spots (noun): small round marks on a surface | loc: цятки
  EN TS: The red roof has white spots.
  ua TS: На червоному даху білі цятки.
  EN FS: The red roof has black spots.
  ua FS: На червоному даху чорні цятки.
  EN TP: a cap with white spots
  ua TP: шапка з білими цятками
  EN FP: a dog with white spots
  ua FP: пес із білими цятками
